Table     of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Economic Trends--FEATURE:  Tax Cuts in Stimulus Package 
Will Have Limited Impact; FEATURE:  Articles Debate Tax Cuts as 
Economic Stimulus Measures; FEATURE:  Industry Sectors Hoping Tax 
Cut Will Boost Consumption 

   Environmental Issues - U.S.-Japan Framework Agreement on 
Environmental Technology 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Bank of Japan Seeking Independence 
From MOF; Sumitomo Bank Supporting Japanese Firms in Vietnam, China; 
MOF To Relax Controls on New Stock Market Listings in FY94; SEC 
Adopts Report on Ending Ban on Firms Buying Their Own Stock 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Industry Group Visits 
China, Assesses Cutting Tool Industry; Marubeni To Build $300 
Million LPG Distribution Network; Murata Forms Beijing JV To Make 
Ceramic Capacitors 

   INDONESIA:  NSK To Build Miniature Bearings Plant Near Jakarta 

   THAILAND:  Falling Stocks of Thai Rubber Place Trading Firms in 
Tight Spot 

   UNITED STATES:  Canon Plans To Market New High-Efficiency Solar 
Battery 

   Petroleum/Energy - MITI To Begin Study of Solar Energy Generation 
in Space 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - FEATURE:  NEC Focuses on 
Multimedia Communications; IBM Japan Wins Last Government 
Supercomputer Bid; Canon Wins Orders To Provide Cray, KSR 
Supercomputers 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - FEATURE:  IDO To Expand Service 
Area for Motorola Cellular Network; MPT Undertakes Efforts To Assist 
Emerging Multimedia Market 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Forecast for 1994 National 
Economy; Outlook for Individual, Private Economy in 1994; Shanghai 
Striving for Industrial Breakthroughs in 1994 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Indigenous Insurance Industry Not 
Ready for Foreign Competition; CEI Database Reports 1993 Foreign 
Trade Figures; Hong Kong Firm To Build Toll Roads in Guangdong; 
Guoco Group Invests in Shanghai Real Estate Development; Lei Shing 
Invests HK$1 Billion To Redevelop Shanghai District; Jardines Said 
Unaffected by Sino-British Relations; Hong Kong Exports for Outward 
Processing Rise 10 Percent in 3d Quarter; Record Foreign Capital 
Contracts in Sichuan in 1993; Tianjin Approves Record Number of 
Foreign-Funded Enterprises in January; Guangdong Has Nearly 4,500 
Foreign-Invested Enterprises; Hebei Preferential Policies Attract 
Foreign Investment; Liaoning Foreign-Funded Enterprises Increase in 
1993; BASF Invests in Nanjing Joint-Venture Polystyrene Plant 
Taiwan Investment in Guangxi Increases in 1993; Australian Group 
Launches Joint Resort Project in Hainan; Mainland Chemical Firm 
Plans Hong Kong Listing; Trade Volume in Pudong's New District 
Accelerated in 1993; Mainland Investors Return to Surging Hong Kong 
Real Estate Market 

   Taiwan:  Enterprise Groups Establish Close Relations With 
Southeast Asian Nations; National Bank Sets Goal for Money Supply 
Growth at 10-15 Percent in 1994; Economic Planning Official Expounds 
on Creating Operational Center; Impact of U.S. Lifting Embargo on 
Vietnam Viewed 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Steel Firms Facing Changing Global 
Market; FEATURE:  New Approach To Collecting Foreign S&amp;T Information 

Noted; FEATURE:  Record Growth Reported in Private Research 
Institutes; FEATURE:  Samsung Moving Into Helicopter, Fixed-Wing Air 
Transport; Japanese Newspaper Interviews Hyundai Motors CEO; 
Sunkyong Subsidiary Acquires U.S. Microfilm Factory; Korean-Language 
Software Development To Be Subsidized; Government To Invest in 
Multimedia Industry; Taehan Wool To Build Joint-Venture Plant in 
Vietnam; Cement Companies Consider Building Plants in Pakistan, 
China; Taebong Electronics To Open Plant in China in March; Samsung 
Introduces Integrated Customer Service Plan for Europe 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  Trade Possibilities With Iran 
Reported; Taiwanese Companies To Relocate in Indonesia; Government's 
Position on Funding 'Mega-Projects'; Official Comments on Natuna Gas 
Negotiations 

   LAOS: Malaysia To Invest in Agriculture, Forestry 

   MALAYSIA:  FEATURE:  Government Outlines Strategies To Attract 
More Investment; Samsung To Produce Picture Tubes for Computer 
Monitors 

   PHILIPPINES:  Hong Kong Company To Build Power Station; Sale of 
Oil Shares to Saudi Aramco Reported; Joint Venture Agreements Signed 
With Malaysian Firms 

   THAILAND:  Finance Ministry Sets 1995 Budget at $28.6 Billion 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Foreign Firms Show Interest in Export Zone, 
New City; FEATURE:  Changes in State Enterprises Reported; Stock 
Exchange Opening Delayed by Slow Privatization Efforts; State Bank 
Takes Steps To Increase Capital Mobilization; Thai Companies 
Undertaking Range of Investments; Malaysian Company To Develop Da 
Nang Export Processing Zone; Singapore Firm To Build Housing Complex 
in Ho Chi Minh City; Top Foreign Investor Countries Listed; Foreign 
Investment in 1993 in Hanoi Reported; Thai Firms To Build Video 
Conference System, Industrial Park; Japan, Taiwan To Provide 
Equipment for Cement Plant; Telecommunications Agreement Signed With 
Canada; Joint Venture With Japan To Produce Paper 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Revew FBPSP 94-04) 

   JAPAN:  Economic Trends - FEATURE:  Tax Cuts in Stimulus Package 
Will Have Limited Impact--SUMMARY:  Private economists predict that 
the government's economic stimulus package announced on 8 February 
will increase Japan's FY94 real gross domestic product (GDP) growth 
rate by 1.2 to 1.3 percentage points, thanks to large tax cuts. 
According to press reports, these economists believe the stimulus 
package will raise the FY94 real GDP growth rate to 0.5-1.2 percent, 
in place of the poorer performance that would occur without the 
stimulus package.  The Economic Planning Agency (EPA), reportedly 
has a rosier view, anticipating that the package will increase the 
real GDP growth rate by 2.0 percentage points and raise FY94's real 
GDP growth rate to 2.4 percent. 

   Private Economists Predict Little Impact From Tax Cuts - To 
stimulate Japan's stagnant economy, on 8 February the government 
announced its "largest ever" comprehensive economic stimulus package 
totaling 15.25 trillion yen ($139 billion), including tax cuts of 
5.85 trillion yen ($53 billion).  Private economists predict that 
the package will have a "limited impact" on Japan's FY94 real GDP, 
according to the 9 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  The 
paper notes that an economic  simulation undertaken with NIKKEI's 
macroeconomic model, the "NIKKEI Needs-Economy," projects that the 
package will add 1.2 percentage points to real GDP growth, moving 
the economy from an estimated minus 0.7 percent in real GDP to a 
positive 0.5 percent growth rate in FY94. 

   The NIKKEI model also predicts that the package will increase 
personal consumption by 1.2 percentage points thanks to the tax 
cuts.  Although the package will increase private capital investment 
by 1.6 percentage points in FY94, the absolute value of private 
capital investment "will decrease from the FY93 level."  Increased 
loan amounts by the Housing Loan Corporation, Japan Development 
Bank, and Japan Finance Corporation for Small Business worth about 3 
trillion yen ($27 billion) in the package show little impact on 
growth in the simulation; the model assumes that loans to be 
extended by government financial institutions will only displace 
private loans, and therefore will have no net stimulative effect. 

   According to the NIKKEI article, Masaru Takagi, chief economist 
at the Fuji Research Institute, forecasts that the package will do 
little to promote a self-sustaining business recovery.  Takagi 
estimates that the package will have the actual effect of raising 
Japan's real GDP growth rate by 1.3 percentage points in FY94. 
Takagi notes, however, that even with the package, Japan's real GDP 
growth rate will increase "less than 1.0 percent" in FY94 because of 
the ongoing recession.  According to NIKKEI, Asahi Bank also 
predicts that the package will increase real GDP by 1.3 percentage 
points, with a 0.6 percentage point contribution from tax cuts, 
pushing the FY94 real GDP up to 1.2 percent. 

   EPA Estimates Spending, Tax Cuts Will Increase GDP by 2 Percent - 
According to NIKKEI, Makoto Nomura, director of the Coordination 
Division in the EPA's Coordination Bureau, explains that the EPA's 
calculations show tax cuts generating new output of goods and 
services worth 2.9 trillion yen ($26 billion) and "other parts" of 
the package generating 7.3 trillion yen ($66 billion) in new demand. 
Nomura claims that "the total 10.2 trillion yen ($92 billion) will 
be equivalent to a 2.2 percentage point increase in nominal GNP, or 
a 2.0 percentage point increase in real GDP."  Nomura adds, however, 
that most of the package's impact will appear in FY94. 

   Package Will Have Limited Effect on Nonperforming Assets, Land - 
In a 9 February editorial, NIKKEI praises the inclusion in the 
package of some measures that deal with asset deflation problems, 
such as the nonperforming assets of banks and a weak land market, 
that are considered "primary obstacles" to economic recovery.  At 
the same time, NIKKEI concedes that the measures will have "limited" 
effects.  One measure is to allow the Organization for Promoting 
Urban Development (OPUD), a nonprofit organization under the 
Ministries of Construction and Transport, to purchase land from the 
private sector, hold it for up to five years, and then sell it for 
public works projects. 

   According to the 24 January NIKKEI, the OPUD will borrow funds 
from private banks at the long-term prime lending rate--currently 
3.5 percent-- to buy land worth 100 billion yen ($909 million) a 
year for five years.  The government's Fiscal Investment and Loan 
Program will guarantee repayment.  Of the 3.5 percent interest rate 
the OPUD will pay, according to NIKKEI, 1.0 percentage point will be 
subsidized by the government.  The paper notes, however, that the 
OPUD will not buy land with "complicated collateral rights," and if 
the land purchased is not sold after five years, the seller must buy 
it back at the price the OPUD paid plus interest. 

   According to NIKKEI, while government officials are aware that 
the one- year income tax cut adopted in the package--with the timing 
of a compensating increase in the consumption tax left unsettled--is 
not exactly what the U.S. Government has been demanding, a senior 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs official commented that "the Clinton 
administration will not push its demand at the cost of destroying 
the Hosokawa Government." 

   FEATURE:  Articles Debate Tax Cuts as Economic Stimulus Measures 
- SUMMARY:  Writing in NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN, an Osaka University 
professor asserts that a consumption tax cut would be a "far more 
effective" stimulus for Japan's stagnant economy than an income tax 
cut.  He argues that unlike a 20 percent income tax cut, a 
consumption tax cut would benefit all households, including those 
with low incomes, whose propensity to consume is higher than that of 
high income earners.  As a result, Japan could expect greater 
increases in consumption and subsequent production.  Some economists 
anticipate that much of the income tax cuts will be saved, according 
to press reports. 

   Economist Urges Consumption Tax Cut As Economic Stimulus - 
Writing in the 10 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), Osaka 
University Professor Tatsuo Hatta asserts that suspension of the 
consumption tax (currently at 3 percent) would be a "far more 
effective" economic stimulus measure than an income tax cut. Hatta 
argues that increased personal consumption financed by a consumption 
tax cut would be the "most effective way" to give a boost to Japan's 
stagnant economy.  Since consumers tend to continue spending the 
same amount of money, Hatta notes, Japan can expect actual 
consumption and subsequent production increases of at least 3 
percent if the consumption tax were to be suspended.  Hatta proposes 
a consumption tax cut if the economy does not improve. 

   Hatta explains that a consumption tax cut would likely lead to 
more spending than saving, whereas an income tax cut would likely 
lead to more saving than spending in Japan.  This is true because a 
consumption tax cut benefits low-income households, whose propensity 
to consume is much higher than that of high-income earners. 
Consequently, tax benefits for low- income households stimulate 
consumption and thereby business activity.  In Hatta's view, the 
benefits from the 20 percent across-the-board income tax cut adopted 
by the government on 8 February "accrues disproportionately" to 
higher income households with annual incomes over 10 million yen 
($95,000). 

   Hatta argues that regardless of income levels, a consumption tax 
cut would promote more consumption by those who want to buy durable 
goods.  A household with an annual income of 8 million yen ($76,000) 
that wants to buy a house costing 50 million yen ($476,000) would 
receive a benefit worth 1.5 million yen ($14,000) from the 
suspension of the consumption tax, instead of the 158,000 yen 
($1,500) it would gain from the income tax cut.  Hatta comments that 
a consumption tax cut would strongly promote private housing 
investment, which has a multiplier effect on business activity. 

   Economists Expect Small Impact from Income Tax Cut - Some 
economists think that the tax cuts will mostly end up in savings. 
According to the 23 January NIKKEI, Mikio Wakatsuki, director of the 
Japan Research Institute and former Bank of Japan policy board 
member, states that "only half" of an income tax cut will end up 
being spent, but this "should prevent the economy from deteriorating 
further."  Keio University Professor Haruo Shimada feels that "most" 
of the tax cuts will be saved or used to repay debts in the face of 
an uncertain employment situation, according to the 22 January 
NIKKEI.  Therefore, he concludes, a "large lift effect" on the 
economy can not be expected.  Tokyo University Professor Keimei 
Kaizuka, writing in the 1 October 1993 NIKKEI, observed that tax 
cuts would be saved for the most part because of an uncertain 
employment situation and the growing numbers of people facing 
retirement.  Kaizuka noted that many households bought cars and 
other durable goods during the bubble economy period, so they will 
not need to buy such goods "for at least two or three more years." 

   Low-income households would benefit little from the income tax 
cut, but households with an annual income over 10 million yen 
($95,000) would receive the "real" benefit, the 9 February MAINICHI 
explains.  The income and local residential tax cuts worth 5.47 
trillion yen ($52 billion) included in the stimulus package will be 
implemented by cutting FY94 income and local residential taxes by 20 
percent as long as the reduction does not exceed a ceiling of 2 
million yen ($19,000) for the income tax cut and 200,000 yen 
($1,900) for the local residential tax cut.  According to a Ministry 
of Finance document cited by the paper, a standard household 
(husband, wife, and two children) with an annual income of 3 million 
yen ($29,000) will gain 1,250 yen ($12) from the cuts; a household 
with an annual income of 6 million yen ($58,000) will receive 71,400 
yen ($680); while a household with an annual income of 10 million 
yen (95,000) will receive 267,000 yen ($2,543). 

   FEATURE:  Industry Sectors Hoping Tax Cut Will Boost Consumption 
- SUMMARY:  While the automobile and electrical appliance industries 
hope the tax cuts adopted in the Japanese Government's recent 
stimulus package will boost consumption, the distribution industry 
doubts the total value of consumption will increase much, according 
to press reports. 

   Manufacturers Hope for Increase in Consumption - Japan's 
manufacturing industries hope that the tax cuts included in the 
Japanese Government's 8 February stimulus package will boost 
consumption, according to the 9 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI).  The automobile industry estimates that the nearly 6 
trillion yen ($57 billion) income tax cut would create demand for 
additional 150,000 cars.  Further, the special 4.5 percent 
consumption tax on cars will be eliminated in favor of the standard 
3.0 percent consumption tax.  There is a chance, the industry 
estimates, that this change will create demand for additional 50,000 
cars. 

   According to the 10 February NIKKEI RYUTSU SHIMBUN, consumers 
owning cars that are approaching their seventh-year car inspection 
(which costs about $1,000) "will surely buy new cars," and those 
owning cars that are approaching the fifth-year car inspection will 
also buy new cars this year, since "consumers believe that the 
consumption tax will surely be raised in the near future." 

   Following the auto industry in terms of expectations are the 
electrical appliance and audio visual (AV) equipment sectors, 
according to the NIKKEI RYUTSU article.  The electrical appliance 
industry expects many room air conditioners to be sold.  Although 
most households have at least one room air conditioner, on average 
only 40 percent of rooms have an air conditioner installed.  The 
industry hopes the summer of 1994 will be "hot," because the 
industry was unable to sell many room air conditioners in the summer 
of 1993 due to the unusually cool weather.  In addition, the AV 
industry hopes households will buy second and third color television 
sets and video cassette recorders. 

   Distribution, Food Industries Doubt Consumption Increases - The 
distribution industry, on the other hand, "does not have such rosy 
expectations," NIKKEI RYUTSU observes.  In the case of automobile 
dealers, increased sales of used cars are "dragging down" prices on 
the most broadly marketed new cars.  The situation is the same for 
electrical appliances and audio visual equipment, the article notes. 
The prices of most popular models have been declining since 1991. 
The industry anticipates this trend will continue for "five more 
years or so," because of an oversupply resulting from the recent 
relaxation of the Large Retail Store Law and increased imports 
stimulated by the strong yen. 

   In addition, Takuya Okada, chairman of Jusco Supermarket Chain, 
is quoted in the 21 January NIKKEI as saying that changes in the 
behavior of consumers will also "block" total consumption value from 
rising.  As an example, Okada observes that women who formerly 
bought expensive dresses made in France and Italy now do not 
hesitate to buy cheap ones made in China and Hong Kong. 

   According to the 9 February NIKKEI, the food industry expects the 
tax cuts to stimulate sales of foodstuffs "to a degree," but doubts 
whether the trend of falling prices can be stopped.  Japan's 
breweries, on the other hand, anticipate decreased sales of beer due 
to an increase in the tax on beer. 

   Environmental Issues - U.S.-Japan Framework Agreement on 
Environmental Technology -- The U.S. and Japanese Governments have 
concluded an agreement to "initiate cooperative research and 
development in environmental technology" under the common agenda of 
"global cooperation" as part of the economic framework talks.  Both 
countries will cooperate in six areas related to the prevention of 
global warming and the destruction of the ozone layer, including 
pyrolysis and catalytic decomposition of chlorofluorocarbons and the 
conversion of industrial waste into fuel.  The Government Industrial 
Research Institute (GIRl) under the Ministry of International Trade 
and Industry's Agency of Industrial Science and Technology (AIST) 
and the U.S. Environmnental Protection Agency's Air and Energy 
Engineering Research Laboratory will be the main government bodies 
spearheading this cooperative effort.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
11 Feb 94 p 1) 

   Japan and the United States have also agreed to initiate 
cooperative financial and technical aid to address environmental 
issues in the East European countries as part of an "action plan" 
under the "global cooperation" of the economic framework talks.  The 
action plan defines U.S.-Japan cooperation in five areas, including 
environmental, population, and AIDS-related issues.  Environmental 
assistance to Hungary, Poland and the Czech and Slovak Republics is 
the "prime objective" in the environment area. 

   By spring, the two countries will establish an advisory committee 
comprised of experts on economic cooperation and environmental 
issues to discuss appropriate aid measures.  In addition, the 
Japanese Government will contribute $1 billion to the countries in 
yen loans or through the Japan Export-Import Bank, and may set up a 
fund at its Central and East Europe Environment Center in Hungary 
for conducting studies of the region.  The U.S. side has also 
promised financial cooperation. 

   It seems that the Japanese side is seeking to stress the breadth 
and depth of the U.S.-Japan relationship by designing this kind of 
cooperative action plan in light of recent unsatisfactory attempts 
to reach agreement in the other framework areas.  (Tokyo NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN 11 Feb 94 p 7) 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Bank of Japan Seeking Independence 
From MOF -- SUMMARY:  Debate over revising the wartime Bank of Japan 
(BOJ) Act to give the bank greater independence from the Government 
of Japan (GOJ) continues, according to press reports.  Recent debate 
on the issue stemmed from comments the BOJ appended to a document it 
submitted to the British Government. 

   According to the 13 February SHUKAN YOMIURI, the contents of a 
document submitted by the BOJ as reference material to the British 
Parliament--which was debating the issue of the Bank of England's 
neutrality--has highlighted the "fissure" between the BOJ and the 
Ministry of Finance (MOF).  The document stated that "the BOJ wishes 
to revise the BOJ Act with the aim of establishing complete 
independence from the MOF."  The document also pointed out that for 
the BOJ to be assured of a "neutral" monetary policy, "independence 
from the GOJ is indispensable." 

   This is not the first time revision of the act has been 
considered, notes SHUKAN YOMIURI.  The late Prime Minister Kakuei 
Tanaka tried unsuccessfully to revise the act.  More specifically, 
the BOJ's independence from the GOJ became the source of contention 
in a 1960 report issued by the Financial System Research Committee 
(FSRC), an advisory council to the MOF, according to the 28 January 
NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  Initially the proposal to give the 
GOJ broader authority over the BOJ was "predominant," but a second 
proposal gained strength later to limit government authority over 
the BOJ, which stated:  "The GOJ only has the right to request 
postponement of a BOJ decision."  Ultimately the contradictory 
proposals were published together in the report and the revision 
issue was shelved. 

   The BOJ Act, promulgated in 1942, has a "strong wartime 
legislative" flavor to it, according to the 27 January SANKEI 
SHIMBUN.  This is evidenced by the BOJ's mission as enunciated in 
Article 2, "to achieve the goals of the state."  Article 43 gives 
the finance minister "directive authority" over the BOJ, while 
Article 47 gives the MOF and cabinet the right to dismiss BOJ 
officials, reports NIKKEI.  The BOJ expressed its frustration over 
this in its document submitted to the British Government by stating 
that "under the BOJ Act, more authority is given to governmental 
organs than in other countries."  Also, many people in the BOJ, 
according to NIKKEI, hold the opinion that "the existence of such 
stipulations alone calls into doubt the BOJ's independence."  This 
"is interpreted" to mean that the BOJ seeks to establish greater 
independence from the government by revising the law. 

   The BOJ is "disturbed" by the sensation its document has 
occasioned, according to the NIKKEI article, leading BOJ Governor 
Mieno to emphasize at a 26 January press conference that he is "not 
considering immediate revision of the BOJ Act."  The BOJ policy 
planning department is said to have "doused" debate on the subject. 
However, "among 'BOJ men' there is sentiment in favor of changing 
the act so as to bring it up to date with the times," NIKKEI 
reports.  The BOJ is concerned over its independence from the GOJ 
because it thinks that "the government does not always honor its 
neutrality with respect to monetary policy."  And, according to a 
BOJ source, it is commonly believed at the BOJ that "because the MOF 
issues government bonds, it has a tendency to request low interest 
rates to lighten the burden of fiscal responsibility." 

   Financial circles are reportedly surprised that the revision 
debate has resurfaced and at the BOJ's "tenacity in the matter," 
according to the SHUKAN YOMIURI article.  It notes that Governor 
Mieno will step down at the end of the year, and that "MOF old boys" 
Mitsuhide Yamaguchi and Yoshihiko Yoshino are "hopefuls" to replace 
Mieno.  Financial industry sources are saying that the BOJ document 
is a diversionary "ball" the BOJ has tossed out to check the MOF so 
that "a strong successor will not come in and stir things up at the 
BOJ." 

   Although Governor Mieno stated that the BOJ is not considering 
immediate revision of the act, he is reported by the 27 January 
NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN as saying that "the act is not in keeping with 
the times" and acknowledges that when the time comes to revise it, 
"the GOJ's authority has to be limited."  The article quotes him as 
saying that he "wants to engage in sufficient discussion from a 
broad range of perspectives and have the Japanese people decide." 
Similarly, the SANKEI article quotes management sources at BOJ:  "If 
the debate to revise the law grows among the Japanese people, then 
naturally we will take appropriate steps." 

   Meanwhile, a BOJ policy planning department division chief has 
published a book explaining the "responsibilities and independence" 
of the central bank, among other things, according to the 4 January 
SANKEI SHIMBUN. 

   Sumitomo Bank Supporting Japanese Firms in Vietnam, China - 
Sumitomo Bank is strengthening its consulting operations in Asia to 
support Japanese companies establishing operations there, according 
to the 10 February NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  Facing prospects of a 
strong yen, Japanese companies are eager to penetrate Asian markets, 
and Sumitomo is supporting them by enhancing its consulting 
operations through a series of seminars, research publications, and 
training programs, particularly concerning Vietnam and China.  The 
company will start by- nearly doubling personnel in its Vietnam and 
China trade and investment consulting office in FY94. 

   Sumitomo intends to establish a representative office in 
Vietnam's Ho Chi Minh City in the spring of 1994, the paper notes. 
In addition, its trade and investment consulting office will hold an 
"investment in Vietnam" seminar and dispatch a "Vietnam observation" 
mission there this spring or summer.  Sumitomo has begun providing 
information to its Japanese clients on investing in Vietnam and 
changes in laws there. 

   Concerning China, NIKKEI KINYU adds, Sumitomo will offer a 
seminar on "Chinese tax laws" in April 1994 to Japanese companies 
rushing to set up operations there.  It will also publish materials 
on the investment climate in various Chinese cities.  Sumitomo will 
also upgrade a position to  permanent status in its China office in 
Osaka. 

   The 15 February NIKKEI KINYU adds that Sumitomo will offer a 
seminar to local financial institutions in Beijing in mid-March 
concerning banking practices to "enhance its ties with them" and as 
part of its attempt to upgrade its Beijing representative office to 
a branch.  Sumitomo also plans to upgrade its two other Chinese 
representative offices, in Shanghai and Dalian, to branches. 
Sumitomo currently has branch offices in Hong Kong and Guangzhou. 

   The 26 November 1993 NIKKEI KINYU reports that Sumitomo's think 
tank, the Japan Research Institute, will begin issuing a monthly 
research publication in April 1994 on the Asian economies, with the 
emphasis on medium-to-long-term macroeconomic analyses of China. 
"Topics for companies going into China" will be one of three regular 
features in the issues. 

   In addition, the 2 November 1993 NIKKEI KINYU reports that 
Sumitomo has instituted a companywide recruitment system for 
employees desiring to work in its Chinese-speaking offices. 
Sumitomo has sent employees through Chinese-language training 
before, but since it has refined its focus of "giving serious 
consideration to China," it has introduced this internal recruitment 
system to "deepen its talent pool."  Two or three employees will be 
chosen for a curriculum of language study, overseas study, and 
rotations in divisions doing business related to China, a recruiting 
program Sumitomo plans to carry out regularly in the future. 

   MOF To Relax Controls on New Stock Market Listings in FY94 - The 
Ministry of Finance (MOF) has decided to ease restrictions on the 
number of companies that can be newly listed on Japan's stock 
markets and the number of companies issuing new stock offerings. 
Sometime in April 1994 the MOF will increase the number of newly 
listed companies and offerings from the current three per week to 
five or six. 

   Beginning in December 1991, after concluding that new listings 
and offerings might pull funds out of the stock market, drive down 
stock prices, and weaken the market mechanism, the MOF exercised 
administrative guidance" to stop new company listings and new stock 
offerings in the over-the-counter (OTC) market.  Since then the MOF 
has gradually relaxed controls, first in May 1992 by permitting new 
offerings at the pace of one company per week, and since August 1993 
increasing the number to the current two or three per week.  The 
rebound in the volume of stock trading in 1994 to more than twice 
its previous low level has alleviated MOF fears that the market 
might be unable to absorb additional trading. 

   The MOF will decide on the exact number of companies to be newly 
listed  once it sees how the market absorbs additional issues in 
March.  It is considering taking this step in early April, after the 
fiscal year ends (FY93 ends on 31 March), because of concern over 
any possible impact on the level of stock prices at the end of FY93. 
More than 100 companies "are waiting their turn" for new listings or 
offerings.  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 10 Feb 94 p 1) 

   SEC Adopts Report on Ending Ban on Firms Buying Their Own Stock - 
The Subcommittee on Fair Securities Trading of the Securities and 
Exchange Council (SEC) on 7 February formally adopted a report on 
the prospective lifting of the ban on companies purchasing their own 
stock.  The ban is expected to be lifted in April 1995, after 
revisions are made in Japan's Commercial Code and the Securities and 
Exchange Law.  The report "requires" that a means for companies to 
purchase their own stock be incorporated in a revision to the 
Securities and Exchange Law. 

   Citing transparency of transactions as a goal, the report 
recommended introducing means for companies to acquire their own 
stock through direct purchases on the market.  It also cited the 
need for disclosure of such acquisitions, including disclosure of 
plans to acquire stock after a proposal to do so has been approved 
at a general stockholders meeting, and reporting the status of 
purchases to the Ministry of Finance (MOF) on a quarterly basis and 
in a securities report.  The report gave examples of what might 
constitute market manipulation, including the case of a company 
placing an order to purchase stocks before the market opened at a 
price higher than the closing price the previous day, or 
commissioning several securities firms to make purchases at the same 
time.  But the report did not include recommendations specifying 
acceptable acquisitions. 
   The SEC subcommittee is studying regulatory measures to control 
insider trading once companies are allowed to acquire their own 
stock.  It believes there is a need to revise the Securities and 
Exchange Law, and that once a revision is compiled by the MOF, it 
will be submitted to the ordinary session of the Diet.  The 
subcommittee report will be formally confirmed at the SEC's general 
meeting on 21 February.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 8 Feb 94 p 7) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Industry Group Visits 
China, Assesses Cutting Tool Industry -- The Tool Committee of the 
Japan Machinery Exporters' Association (JMEA) sent a group of 
industry representatives to China in September 1993 to study China's 
cutting tool industry and its potential for technical cooperation, 
consigned processing, imports and exports, as well as to "contribute 
to the export of Japanese tools."  The preliminary conclusions made 
by the group are that China's demand for cutting tools--carbide 
alloy and high-speed steel tools, grindstones, and pneumatic tools- 
"has jumped dramatically" and there exists a "huge latent demand 
for Japan's tool-export industry."  However, the group also warned 
that domestic competition among Chinese manufacturers will 
intensify, leading to "extremely low export prices," which could 
affect prices in overseas markets.  Also, a few Chinese firms "may 
even pose a threat to Japanese companies."  To prevent this and to 
foster "coexistence and co-prosperity," the group recommends 
"actively promoting the exchange of information and technology with 
related associations and organizations in China." 

   Led by Yuji Oura, vice president of Yuasa Trading Co. and 
chairman of the JMEA Tool Committee, the group included 
representatives of Nachi-Fujikoshi, Nippon Pneumatic Mfg. Co., 
Noritake Co., and Mitsubishi Materials.  The group visited the 
Chengdu Measuring and Cutting Tools Co. Ltd., the Chengdu Tool 
Research Institute of the Ministry of Machine-Building and 
Electronics Industry, both located in Sichuan Province; the Zhuzhou 
Hard Alloy Factory in Hunan Province; the Shenyang Pneumatic Tool 
Factory and the Shenyang First Machine Tool Factory; the Shanghai 
Tool Factory, the Shanghai Grinding Wheel Factory, the Shanghai 
Heavy Vehicle Factory; the Liaoning Provincial Council of the China 
Council for the Promotion of International Trade, the Liaoning 
Provincial Machine-Building Industry Department, the Liaoning 
Provincial Metal Cutting-Tool Technology Association, and the Dalian 
plant of Mabuchi Motors. 

   The group's observations and assessments, broken down by sector, 
are as follows: 

   High-Speed Steel Tools Manufacturing Sector - There are about 800 
high-speed steel tool manufacturers in China which produce about 3 
billion yuan ($344.8 million) worth of tools annually.  The four 
largest firms, which account for nearly 50 percent of total 
production, are the Harbin Measuring and Cutting Tools Plant, which 
employs 7,000 workers and produces 36 million drill bits annually; 
the Chengdu Measuring and Cutting Tools Co. Ltd., 7,000 workers and 
30 million drill bits; the Harbin First Tool Factory, 6,000 workers 
and 40 million drill bits; and the Shanghai Tool Factory, 3,800 and 
40 million drill bits per year. 

   Almost all products are M2 high speed steel cutting tools.  Most 
drill-bits are produced using the rolling method, but the heavy 
grinding process is used for some export products.  Drill-bit 
surface processing is limited by regulations to nitriding.  Heat- 
treatment equipment consists mostly of salt bath furnaces, but the 
Shanghai Tool Factory does have a vacuum annealing furnace.  Most 
manufacturing equipment is obsolete domestically manufactured 
machinery, and numerically controlled (NC) machinery is very scarce. 
Twenty percent of high-speed steel tool sales are direct to users, 
while 80 percent are through machine-industry subsidiaries and 
electronics companies.  Exports are "overwhelmingly drill bits," and 
companies employ both direct sales and an "indirect route" through 
Hong Kong to the United States, Europe, Southeast Asia, and Africa, 
with a particularly high sales ratio to Southeast Asia. 

   Carbide Tool Manufacturers - The two largest companies dominate 
the market, with the Zhuzhou Hard Alloy Factory holding nearly a 70 
percent market share and the Zigong Hard Alloy Factory 30 percent. 
The 50 other small companies are not competitive because of inferior 
quality.  In 1992 China produced 5,600 tons of carbide alloy tools, 
and total 1993 production is expected to be 6,000-6,500 tons.  The 
primary products are metal powders, carbide alloys, and carbide 
tools, but the "product mix ratio is unclear." 

   The Zhuzhou Hard Alloy Factory acquired technology and equipment 
from the Swedish company Sandvik in 1987, which has enabled it "to 
manufacture products which require high-level technologies, such as 
multilayer coatings."  Among the equipment used by the company is a 
hot isostatic press and a chemical vapor deposition furnace.  In 
February 1993 it established the Hunan Diamond Hard Alloy Tool Co. 
Ltd., a joint venture (JV) with a Hong Kong company, to manufacture 
drill bits and end mills.  The JV obtained from Germany a computer 
numerically controlled (CNC) 12-shaft universal tool grinding 
machine, a CNC five-spindle grinder, and a CNC four-spindle 
universal tool grinding machine.  Hunan Diamond produces solid end 
mills, oil-hole drill bits, solid drill bits, brazed drill bits, 
three-flute drill bits, carbide reamers, and carbide taps.  When the 
company reaches full production, "it will pose a threat to Japanese 
companies." 

   Grinding Abrasives Sector - China produces about 3,000 tons of 
grinds tones per year, 50 percent of which are vitrified and 50 
percent resin bond.  The largest grinds tone manufacturer is the 
Zhengzhou No. 2 Grinding Wheel Factory, and there are about 10 
companies nearly the same size as the second largest company, the 
Shanghai Grinding Wheel Factory, which employs 1,700 workers and 
which was the only grindstone manufacturer the JMEA group visited. 
This company produces diamond grinding stones using British 
technology, abrasive cloth by using German machines and technology, 
and grindstones through a JV with the U.S. firm Norton.  The company 
sells only in Shanghai, where demand for grindstones is 7,000 to 
8,000 tons per year.  For the industry as a whole, sales are evenly 
divided between domestic sales and exports, with exports primarily 
going to Southeast Asia. 

   Pneumatic Tools - The group visited China's largest pneumatic 
tool plant, the Shenyang Pneumatic Tool Factory, which employs 
5,000, "but it was unable to obtain data for China as a whole."  The 
Shenyang company has a production capacity of 60,000 tons of 
equipment a year and manufactures tunnel drills, rock drills (bit 
and rod) for mining, and jack hammers.  It has technical cooperation 
agreements for mining tools with the Swedish company Atlas Copco and 
an unnamed Japanese company.  Most of its equipment "is of old 
Chinese manufacture."  It cannot keep up with demand from China's 
road and construction industries and "cannot satisfy the volume or 
quality demands of the Chinese market."  The firm wants to renovate 
its facilities and introduce new technology, but lacks capital and 
hopes to secure Japanese cooperation.  "This represents a big 
opening for Japanese companies." 

   Chengdu Tool Research Institute - This institute, established in 
1956 as the Chengdu Tool Research Institute of the Ministry of 
Machine-Building and Electronics, was moved to Harbin in 1957 and 
then back to Chengdu in 1965.  It employs 950 workers, of which 500 
are technicians.  The purpose of the institute is to foster domestic 
tool manufacturers and promote, through the State Plan, guidance on 
quality control measures.  Because of shrinking state budgets, it is 
"trying to establish its own economic viability" by undertaking "the 
small-lot manufacture of special tools" that are beyond the means of 
companies. 

   The institute is organized into the Precision Cutting Tools 
(Tool) Department and the Precision Measurement Equipment 
Department.  The Tool Department conducts research on the 
development of tool materials, including carbide tools, cubic boron 
nitride tools, and diamond and ceramic tools; the development of 
surface processing technology; and the development of special 
materials.  The Measurement Equipment Department researches 
equipment to measure gear measurement errors, laser measurement 
equipment, and three-dimensional measurement equipment.  (Tokyo JMEA 
JOURNAL Nov 93 pp 33-37) 

   Marubeni To Build $300 Million LPG Distribution Network - 
Marubeni Corp., one of Japan's largest general trading companies, 
plans to invest $300 million to build what will become the largest 
liquefied petroleum gas (LPG) storage and distribution network in 
China.  The two-tier system, capable of moving 2 million tons of LPG 
annually, will consist of two primary storage facilities--one in 
Shenzhen to serve South China, and one in Shanghai for East China- 
-each capable of storing 80,000 tons of LPG.  In addition, five 
secondary LPG storage facilities, each capable of storing 2,000- 
3,000 tons, will be built in the provinces surrounding each primary 
facility.  The South China network will supply Guangdong, Hainan, 
and Fujian Provinces and the Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region.  The 
East China network will supply Jiangsu, Zhejiang and Shandong 
Provinces.  The Shenzhen facility is scheduled to be completed by 
1996, and the Shanghai one by 1998. 

   Marubeni has already established a joint venture (JV) company in 
Shenzhen to handle overall operations of its South China network, 
and in March it will establish a JV company, the Jiangyin Changjiang 
Liquefaction Co. Ltd., in Jiangyin City, Jiangsu Province, to 
oversee the East China network.  The JV company will be capitalized 
at $3 million, with the Chinese partners, including China 
Petrochemical International Co., investing 70 percent and Marubeni 
30 percent.  Jiangyin Changjiang Liquefaction will build a $6 
million distribution center, scheduled for completion by the end of 
1994.  Marubeni estimates annual LPG sales will be 100,000 tons and 
sales will total $50 million.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 2 Feb 94 
p 1) 

   Murata Forms Beijing JV To Make Ceramic Capacitors - Murata 
Manufacturing, one of the world's largest manufacturers of ceramic 
capacitors, will establish a joint venture (JV) company with the 
state-run Beijing Third Radio Equipment Factory to manufacture 
ceramic capacitors.  The JV company, Beijing Murata Electronics, 
will be capitalized at $20 million, with Murata investing 77 percent 
and Beijing Third Radio Equipment Factory the remainder. 

   Beijing Murata will be located in the Beijing Economic and 
Technology Development Zone and is scheduled to begin production in 
the second half of 1994.  In three years it will employ 200 workers 
and manufacture 2 billion capacitors annually, with most sold to 
Chinese electronics companies and the rest exported.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 3 Feb 94 p 8) 

   INDONESIA:  NSK To Build Miniature Bearings Plant Near Jakarta - 
NSK, Japan's largest manufacturer of bearings, will invest 5 billion 
yen ($47 million) to establish a wholly owned subsidiary, "PT NSK 
Bearings Manufacturing," and build a 65,000 square-meter miniature 
bearings plant in a suburb of Jakarta.  Groundbreaking for the plant 
will be in May 1994, and actual production is scheduled to begin in 
June 1995.  By the end of 1995 the subsidiary plans to be producing 
1.8 million bearings per month, increasing output to 2.5 million per 
month by the end of 1996. 

   With the increase in the number of Japanese companies throughout 
Southeast Asia, demand for miniature bearings used in electrical 
appliances and machinery has grown rapidly.  To date NSK has 
exported bearings made in Japan, but with the appreciation of the 
yen, profits have fallen and the company decided it was necessary to 
build a local production facility. 

   NSK has plants in Britain and the United States, but this will be 
its first in Southeast Asia.  The Indonesian plant will export to 
Japan and China as well as Southeast Asia.  Completion of the plant 
will place NSK in "direct competition" with Minebea, another leading 
Japanese manufacturer of miniature bearings, which has a plant in 
Thailand.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 4 Feb 94 p 9) 

   THAILAND:  Falling Stocks of Thai Rubber Place Trading Firms in 
Tight Spot -- The offer price to Japan for natural rubber produced 
in Thailand has increased suddenly, causing prices to rise sharply 
on Japan's domestic market and placing the general trading companies 
that supply the rubber to tire companies in a tight spot.  The 
delivery price of "ribbed smoked sheet (RSS) 3" for bulk purchasers 
in Tokyo rose to 121 yen per kilogram on 10 February 1994, an 
increase of 11 yen (10 percent) since the beginning of the month and 
representing a 7-month high. 

   There are several factors behind the price increases.  One is 
declining rubber production in Thailand, the world's major producer 
of sheet-form rubber, and the corresponding drop in its stocks. 
Another is that from December 1993 to January 1994, in what would 
normally be the peak period for rubber production, output actually 
decreased due to weather conditions.  In addition, the Thai 
Government is continuing its policy of buying intervention in the 
market.  For these reasons, the offer price to Japan has increased 
substantially. 

   Japan's domestic demand for rubber used to manufacture tires had 
been sluggish for a prolonged period, so that Japanese trading 
companies have concentrated on buying for "immediate use."  But now 
the current stocks held by the trading companies have already fallen 
to "half the level of a typical year" and are estimated to stand at 
only 30,000 tons.  Since Thailand and other Southeast Asian 
producing areas now are entering their seasonal low-production 
period, the trading companies state that "there is a chance we will 
not be able to supply the amount specified in our contracts with 
tire manufacturers due to insufficient supplies."  Therefore, the 
trading companies are accelerating their search for supplies in 
other world rubber-producing areas.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 11 
Feb 94 p 16) 

   UNITED STATES:  Canon Plans To Market New High-Efficiency Solar 
Battery -- Canon and its U.S. venture partner, Energy Conversion 
Devices, have developed a solar battery which performs more 
efficiently than current models.  The battery maintains an energy 
conversion rate of 10.2 percent after about 1,000 hours of 
irradiation testing--equivalent to a three-year operating period on 
a rooftop--a rate considerably higher than the current record of 6 
percent.  United Solar Systems Co. (USSC), a Michigan-based joint 
venture company established by Canon and Energy Conversion Devices, 
will build a $30 million facility in Newport News, Virginia to mass 
produce the solar battery and will oversee production-related 
activities.  USSC forecasts a large demand for the solar battery in 
residential rooftop solar systems and for windows of business 
offices.  Canon hopes to begin shipments of the battery in 1995. 

   Made from an amorphous silicon compound, the battery is 100 
square centimeters in size.  It is designed so that each layer in 
its three-layer configuration changes the wavelengths of the 
incoming solar rays so that the battery absorbs the same amount of 
light as current models, but also effectively reduces any 
deterioration in battery performance.  The battery requires $.16 per 
kilowatt hour in generating costs, which is half of the $.25 to $.50 
per kilowatt hour required by current commercial batteries.  Canon 
anticipates that generating costs will drop to about $.12 per 
kilowatt hour once the battery enters mass production.  (Tokyo 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 11 Feb 94 p 1) 

   Petroleum/Energy - MITI To Begin Study of Solar Energy Generation 
in Space -- The Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) 
will conduct a two-year feasibility study beginning next year on a 
project to generate solar energy in space.  The project involves 
using a satellite equipped with solar batteries in a geostationary 
orbit 36,000 km above the equator to generate energy from the sun, 
convert it into microwaves, and beam this energy back to earth. 
Japan is the first country to actually begin experimental work on 
such a system as a national project. 

   MITI also plans to build a test facility for microwave 
transmission next year for about 100 million yen ($970,000).  The 
facility will include a high-energy microwave transmission system, 
which includes amplifiers, transmitting and receiving antennas, and 
rectifiers.  MITI will use this facility to study which systems lose 
the least energy in the conversion and transmission process, assess 
microwave transmission and reception technologies, and to study the 
impact of these systems on the environment.  MITI will use the data 
gathered in its 1991-1993 program to study international efforts 
concerning space energy generation systems.  MITI hopes to achieve 
commercial applications for this project by 2040.  (Tokyo SANKEI 
SHIMBUN 1 Feb 94 p 3 Evening) 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - FEATURE:  NEC Focuses on 
Multimedia Communications -- SUMMARY:  According to Japanese press 
reports, NEC Corp. is focusing on the multimedia sector, the next- 
generation area of communications. It has developed an integrated- 
circuit (IC) set to be used in building asynchronous transfer mode 
(ATM) local area networks (LANs) and a high-speed semiconductor 
optical switch for large-capacity optical communications.  The 
company is expanding the number of employees at its U.S. subsidiary 
to develop chip sets for multimedia applications. 

   The 25 January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reports that NEC has 
developed an IC set for building LANs connected by an ATM 
communications network, and will begin sending out samples in April. 
Apparently ATM will become the leader among next-generation 
information communication networks, such as the "information 
superhighway."  Currently the "ethernet" method leads the LAN 
market; however, it is estimated that in five to six years the ATM 
method will have about 30 percent of the market.  Fujitsu also has 
plans to make IC sets for LANs by mid-1994.  Competition among 
semiconductor manufacturers to enter the huge market for multimedia 
communication networks is becoming more intense. 

   According to NIKKEI, the ICs developed by NEC will be installed 
in work stations and personal computers.  Sets will consist of two 
ICs--one will divide the communicated data in conformity with the 
ATM method and then reconstruct it, while the second IC will control 
the establishment of various conditions, such as speed at the time 
of data transfer.  The sample price will be 30,000 yen (US$286) per 
set.  Starting in October, NEC will mass-produce sets at a level of 
100,000 per month. 

   The 13 January NIKKEI notes that NEC has also developed a high- 
speed optical switch essential for the large-capacity optical 
communications that will make multimedia a reality.  It has the 
capability of processing one terabit of optical information every 
second and can even control low intensity light.  This is the first 
time a semiconductor optical switch has achieved the terabit level 
of optical information processing.  NEC plans to make the switch on 
one chip within two years. 

   The optical switch controls optical signals through a separate 
light, according to NIKKEI.  Until now, the controlling light could 
only operate when in the "on" mode; however, now it only takes 1 
nanosecond to go from "on" to "off."  The "on" control light is 
followed immediately by the "off" control light, and the on-off 
action can be completed in a picosecond, thus making the terabit 
level of optical information processing possible. 

   U.S. Subsidiary Focus of Development Efforts - The 4 January 
NIKKEI SANGYO reports that Japanese semiconductor manufacturers want 
to strengthen their development systems in the United States to 
become "competitive" in the multimedia market.  Currently the United 
States has a big lead in the development of multimedia equipment and 
services, and thus U.S. semiconductor manufacturers have the lead in 
the development of ICs for that field.  In response, NEC is 
implementing its "system IC project" in the United States focused on 
the multimedia and advanced communication fields. 

   NEC's U.S. subsidiary within the semiconductor market is NEC 
Electronics, according to the NIKKEI SANGYO.  This company has 
already established a team called the "Systems Application 
Engineering (SAE) Group," which develops special application ICs. 
At present there are less than 20 members, but during 1994 the 
number will be increased to 30 or 40.  To date the SAE Group has 
taken on the development of chip sets for hard disk drives and 
portable telephones.  However, with more team members, the group 
will be able to focus on developing chip sets for wireless data 
communication terminals and picture compression used in the 
multimedia industry. 

   IBM Japan Wins Last Government Supercomputer Bid - On 14 
February, IBM Japan won the eleventh and last supercomputer bid-- 
from the National Cancer Center (NCC)--funded under the first FY93 
supplemental budget.  IBM's winning bid of 3.5 billion yen ($33 
million) is the company's first order from a Japanese governmental 
organization.  The bid includes a "complete medical research system" 
for one of two NCC hospitals, its central hospital in Tokyo.  Some 
in the supercomputer industry view IBM's bid as "extremely low." 
The NCC had a total budget of about 7 billion yen ($66 million) 
to procure a supercomputer and research systems for both its central 
and eastern hospitals.  NEC won the bid to install a research system 
in NCC's eastern hospital, in Chiba Prefecture, at a price of 580 
million yen ($5.5 million). 

   IBM will provide a server unit called "SPN" constructed from two 
specially modified IBM "SP1" parallel processing UNIX-based 
supercomputers, which will be combined with one "DECmpp" 
supercomputer unit made by Digital Equipment Co.  One SPN can be 
conf igured with up to 640 RISC-based (reduced instruction set 
computer) processors.  For client units, the system will use "IBM 
RS6O0O" workstations tied to Apple personal computers.  (Tokyo 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 15 Feb 94 p 7) 

   Canon Wins Orders To Provide Cray, KSR Supercomputers - On 9 
February, Canon Supercomputing 5.1. and Cray Japan received an order 
to provide a "research, education, and library" information 
processing system from the Information Processing Center of the 
University of Electro-Communications.  The system centers on a Cray 
"EL98" supercomputer and two "SPARC Server 1000" servers made by Sun 
Microsystems.  This will be the first UNIX-based information 
processing center in a state-supported university.  The system 
should be installed by the end of February and in operation during 
March.  No price information is given. 

   Included in the order are workstations and personal computers 
that will be provided in cooperation with Canon Sales Co.  The EL98 
will be fitted with two processors having the capacity to perform 
133 million floating point operations per second (megaflops). 
(Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 10 Feb 94 p 8) 

   Canon Supercomputing also received a supercomputer order from the 
ATR Interpreting Telephony Research Laboratories in Kyoto.  Canon 
will provide a "KSR1-96" massively parallel processing supercomputer 
made by the U.S. firm Kendall Square Research (KSR).  At a price of 
about 400 million yen ($3.75 million), this is KSR's first MPP 
supercomputer order in Japan.  Reportedly the firm has already 
installed more than 40 units in Europe and the United States.  The 
KSR1 can be configured with up to 96 central processors with a 
maximum calculation speed of 3.84 billion floating point operations 
per second (gigaflops).  ATR will use the supercomputer for research 
on voice translation systems. (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 16 Feb 94 
p 6) 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - FEATURE:  IDO To Expand Service 
Area for Motorola Cellular Network -- SUMMARY:  The Japanese press 
is reporting that IDO, the Japanese mobile communications company 
that is the focus of the current U.S.-Japan market access dispute 
involving Motorola, has decided to halt all work on expanding the 
Nippon Telegraph and Telephone (NTT) cellular telephone network it 
controls and expand its Motorola cellular telephone network. 
Because of competition from a NTT subsidiary, IDO may link up with 
new common carrier (NCC) telephone companies with cellular 
operations to compete against NTT, which could also allow IDO to 
expand into new areas.  IDO's investment plans concerning the 
Motorola system were to have been used as a Japanese "trump card" in 
trade negotiations with the United States, but new U.S. demands 
reportedly precluded this. 

   Nippon Idou Tsushin Corp. (IDO), the mobile communications 
company affiliated with Toyota Motor, reportedly plans to invest 30 
billion yen ($291 million) over a two-year period beginning in 1995 
to expand the service area for its Motorola cellular telephone 
network, according to one of three articles published on page 11 of 
the 10 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  At the same time, 
IDO will "stop all work on expanding the service area for the Nippon 
Telegraph and Telephone (NTT) network."  IDO currently provides 
cellular phone service using both systems, but decided to focus on 
Motorola's system because "it has become difficult to close the gap" 
with rival company NTT Docomo--a NTT subsidiary--by using the NTT 
system.  IDO's decision to expand its Motorola cellular network and 
services represents an effort to "ease trade friction" between Japan 
and the United States, "but can also be said to have been influenced 
by Toyota Motor," IDO's major shareholder. 

   IDO, established in March 1987 with investment from Toyota and 
Teleway Japan, serves the Tokyo metropolitan and Chubu (Nagoya area) 
regions.  IDO reportedly decided to use the Motorola-based cellular 
system in addition to the NTT system to avoid possible U.S. 
sanctions in 1989 stemming from friction in the U.S.-Japan 
negotiations regarding Japan's telecommunications industry.  As of 
December 1993, IDO had 310,000 subscribers on the NTT system and 
about 10,000 on the Motorola system.  The NTT network is supported 
by about 400 base stations, compared to 100 stations for the 
Motorola network. 

   Henceforth, according to NIKKEI, IDO will limit the construction 
of new base stations for the NTT network "to areas where base 
stations already exist," and will use these stations for the sole 
purpose of "extending services to remote areas."  IDO will build 80 
new base stations for the Motorola network by April 1994 and 130 
more base stations over the next two years. 

   NIKKEI also observes that IDO is hoping to strengthen ties with 
the eight cellular telephone companies affiliated with its 
competitor, Dainidenden (DDI), which also provide services via the 
Motorola network in non-IDO service areas, "to counter NTT Docomo's 
nationwide expansion efforts." 

   The costs of building base stations for the Motorola system are 
comparatively cheaper than for the NTT system, NIKKEI notes, and IDO 
can pass on the savings to subscribers by lowering basic monthly 
rates by 10 percent.  It is "inevitable" that the cellular telephone 
market will become fiercely competitive after regulations are lifted 
on selling terminal units and companies are able to freely market 
cellular telephones, as opposed to the current system of leasing 
them under license.  IDO is hoping to increase its customer base by 
promoting the "uniqueness of its Motorola network-based products." 

   IDO, NCCs May Strengthen Ties To Compete Against NTT - A second 
article on the same page of the 10 February NIKKEI notes the 
possibility that the distribution of the cellular telephone service 
market share could change considerably if the NCC telephone 
companies, such as DDI, which individually serve disparate areas in 
Japan, strengthen their ties. 

   As of December 1993, NTT Docomo had 1.24 million subscribers, 
compared to a combined total of 766,000 subscribers served by IDO 
and other cellular phone companies.  Although the NCCs are 
increasing their market share, "the truth of the matter is that the 
gap between IDO's 230,000 subscribers and NTT Docomo's 600,000 
subscribers in the Tokyo metropolitan area is not shrinking."  By 
strengthening its ties with the cellular companies on the Motorola 
network, IDO will be able to lower rates on its NTT system and 
clearly position itself against NTT in "charting its survival 
strategy" by establishing itself as the key element of the cellular 
companies in Japan's metropolitan areas. 

   Expanding Motorola System Will Permit Extention of Service Area - 
A third article in the 10 February NIKKEI reports that if IDO 
expands its Motorola network services, it will be able to extend 
services to areas like Tochigi, Nagano, and Yamagata Prefectures, 
where to date service has not been feasible.  In addition, if the 
eight DDI cellular companies introduce services on their "Roaming" 
network, the combined service area will equal that of NTT Docomo. 
Potential subscribers will no longer have to debate which service to 
use because of service area restrictions, but will instead select 
services "based on cost."  By expanding services on the Motorola 
system, the NIKKEI article notes, IDO and the NCC cellular companies 
"can stage a comeback" against NTT Docomo by offering lower prices. 
Japan Planned To Use IDO Decision as 'Trump Card' in Talks - 
According to the 17 February NIKKEI, IDO's 30 billion yen investment 
plan in the Motorola system was supposed to have been used as a 
"trump card" in last week's trade negotiations with the United 
States.  But the U.S. negotiators came up with "new demands," 
including an expansion of the number of Motorola base stations, so 
that the IDO decision was all but ignored.  This "infuriated" IDO's 
president, who reportedly stated: "Motorola is entering and exiting 
the arena of government-to-government negotiations as it pleases. 
This is something Japanese manufacturers would not even 
contemplate."  IDO anticipated that when its investment in the 
Motorola system is completed, the coverage areas of its NTT and 
Motorola systems "would be about equal," and the U.S. "would not 
complain." 

   MPT Undertakes Efforts To Assist Emerging Multimedia Market - The 
Communications Policy Bureau of the Ministry of Posts and 
Telecommunications (MPT) has established a private forum to discuss 
policies to promote new businesses in the information communications 
industry.  Members of the forum, including executives of venture 
companies, will meet to discuss new business enterprises involving 
the next-generation fiber optic network, discuss policies addressing 
the financial aspects and tax-related assistance for these new 
businesses, and submit their recommendations in May.  The MPT will 
incorporate the recommendations in its new policy measures for 1995 
and beyond so as to nurture the emerging market involving the future 
fiber optics network.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 5 Feb 94 p 4) 

   The MPT will also establish a tax structure for FY94 to support 
businesses involved in building the fiber optic communications 
network.  The MPT has received apprqval from the Ministry of Finance 
to offer tax incentives of an extra 20 percent in depreciation to 
companies involved in laying the optical fiber for trunklines. 
According to MPT estimates, companies investing in the fiber optic 
work on the trunkline portion of the network in FY94 will spend 
about 81 billion yen ($786 million).  In cases where a claim for 20 
percent in depreciation is approved, the company would benefit by 
receiving an annual tax reduction of 5 billion yen ($48.5 million). 
The MPT will offer the incentive over a two-year period. 

   The MPT has defined a "two-stage strategy" to first establish a 
trunkline fiber optic network by upgrading the current copper-wire 
network with optical fiber, and secondly carry out subscriber 
hookups by extending fiber optic links to households and businesses. 
Nippon Telegraph and Telephone (NTT) has completed more than 40 
percent of the optical fiber conversion work but only 3 percent of 
the subscriber hookups.  The MPT hopes its aid measures will help 
bring about a complete conversion to optical fiber as soon as 
possible, and also is seeking to create "other rigorous financial 
aid measures" to expedite the program.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
7 Feb 94 p 3) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Forecast for 1994 National 
Economy -- The decision on the socialist market economy made at the 
third plenary session of the 14th CPC Central Committee in November 
1993 is expected to provide a strong impetus to China's economy and 
be conducive to sustained, rapid, and healthy economic development. 
Based on the central government's design, economic reform in 1994 is 
to effect "all-around advancement with key breakthroughs."  The 
first major goal is enterprise reform, searching for and 
establishing effective means of achieving a modern enterprise 
system.  The second is to reform the financial, tax, and investment 
systems, thus accelerating macroeconomic regulation and transforming 
government management functions.  The third is to institute capital 
goods markets, continue with price reform and develop a unified and 
open market system.  The fourth is to accelerate social security and 
housing reform. 

   In terms of actual effects, enterprise reform will gradually 
enable enterprises to become self-governing, self-reliant, self- 
regulated entities, which will enhance their competitiveness and 
economic efficiency.  Reform of the investment system will make 
localities and enterprises more responsible for their own actions 
and reduce unwarranted investments.  Meanwhile, reform in this 
sector will also facilitate infrastructure construction and ease 
restrictions imposed by related "bottlenecks." 

   Reform in the financial sector, especially the tax sharing 
system, will help curb the "economic fiefdoms" and form a unified 
national market.  It will also help reduce the unrestrained 
expansion made by local officials and thereby reduce potential 
economic swings. 

   Reform of the financial sector will also help control excessive 
money supply and reduce the potential for inflation.  When 
specialized banks become commercial banks, funds will flow to the 
more efficient enterprises and the inefficient ones will be forced 
to go bankrupt.  This will be conducive to both the rational flow of 
capital and an increase in economic efficiency in the entire 
society. 

   Another propelling force in the economy this year is the 
considerable productive force that will be unleashed by the 
unprecedented number of large-scale capital construction projects 
completed in the last two years.  For example, fixed asset 
investments were estimated to increase by 47 percent in 1993.  These 
projects will have a significant impact on the economy in the 
following years. 

   On the other hand, there are also a number of constraints on this 
year's economy.  One of these, inflation, is a major concern.  In 
the current economic system, it is impossible to eliminate 
inflation, nor is it necessary.  The most important thing is to make 
it bearable for all parties concerned.  Recently the central 
government instituted a number of measures to combat inflation in 
order to maintain social stability. 

   In addition, "bottlenecks" will also be a hindrance.  The 
economic development in the past 15 years shows that bottlenecks 
would inevitably stop or reduce the speed of high economic growth. 
Judging from the current situation, transportation and energy 
supplies can probably accommodate a 10-percent rate of economic 
growth. 

   At the end of 1993, the Chinese Academy of Sciences and the State 
Statistics Bureau jointly produced a forecast for China's economic 
development in 1994:  GNP to grow by 10 percent, heavy industries by 
16 percent, light industries by 15.5 percent, fixed assets 
investments by 20 percent, retail commodities by 18.5 percent, and 
retail price index by 9.5 percent.  (Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO 1 Feb 
94 p 1) 

   Outlook for Individual, Private Economy in 1994 - In 1994 
individual businesses will total 19 million, about a 12 percent 
increase over 1993; employ 32 million people, a 15 percent increase; 
and have registered capital of 79 billion yuan, a 35 percent 
increase.  The retail value of commodities will be about 200 billion 
yuan, a 40 percent increase.  Because the number of businesses and 
employees will rapidly increase, competition among individual 
enterprises will intensify. Individual businesses will also face 
tougher competition from state-owned and collective enterprises.  In 
1994 more individual businesses will engage in scientific and 
technical services.  In 1994 individual businesses in urban areas 
will total 6.3 million and employ 10 million.  Individual businesses 
in rural areas will reach 11.4 million and employ 19 million.  In 
1994 individual businesses in the east will account for over 50 
percent of all individual businesses. 

   In 1994 private enterprises will total 370,000, employ 5,350,000, 
and have a registered capital of 200 billion yuan.  Most private 
enterprises will engage in the scientific and technical fields.  In 
1994 capital per private enterprise will be 370,000 yuan, output 
value per enterprise will be 100,000 yuan, and the volume of 
business per enterprise will be 70,000 yuan. Private enterprises in 
urban areas will total 270,000, a 120 percent increase over 1993. 
Private enterprises in rural areas will total 100,000, a 20 percent 
increase.  (Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO 5 Feb 94 p 2) 

   Shanghai Striving for Industrial Breakthroughs in 1994 - 
Shanghai's total industrial production increased by 19.1 percent 
between January and November of 1993 and sales of industrial goods 
increased by 31.8 percent.  Estimates show that Shanghai's total 
industrial production for 1993 will probably reach 280 billion yuan 
and that industrial exports will increase by 15 percent.  Exports of 
machinery and electrical products are estimated to increase by 20 
percent and exports by the private sector to increase by 32 percent, 
to a total of $820 million. 

   Meanwhile, Shanghai's industrial efficiency and structure have 
also improved.  Three out of 14 major industrial projects have been 
completed and gone into production.  Fifty key technology 
innovations are near completion.  Foreign investment between January 
and November of 1993 has already exceeded the 1992 total, and the 
foreign investment projects under contract are estimated to number 
2,500, with a gross value of $2.3 billion. 

   Nonetheless, Shanghai industries also foresee some serious 
problems ahead, namely insufficient social demand for industrial 
goods, higher costs of production, difficulties in large and medium- 
sized enterprises, and severe shortages of operating funds. 

   In seeking major breakthroughs in 1994, Shanghai municipality has 
decided to adopt some new industrial strategies with respect to 
thinking, methods, marketing, adjustments, reform, and management. 
At a recent meeting held for bureau chiefs, Party secretaries, and 
managers,  Municipal Economic Commission Chief Xu Zhiyi stressed 
that in 1994 Shanghai's industrial sector will accelerate reform by 
promoting sales and expanding domestic and international market 
share, by developing automobile, communications, power, computer, 
and household electric industries, by concentrating on large-scale 
investment projects, by attracting more foreign investment, by 
establishing large enterprise groups which are competitive 
domestically and internationally, by experimenting with new reform 
measures in selected enterprises, by improving management in the 
areas of quality control, finance, accounting system, cost, 
competitiveness, and by moving closer to international business 
practices.  (Shanghai SHANGHAI GONGYE JINGJI BAO 28 Dec 93 p 1) 
Foreign Trade and Investment - Indigenous Insurance Industry Not 
Ready for Foreign Competition -- China's insurance industry, which 
insures only 4 percent of domestic enterprises and 70 percent of 
motor vehicles, is characterized by a high level of government 
intervention and regulation coupled with little transparency and an 
incomplete legal framework, according to an article appearing in the 
January issue of a MOFTEC trade journal.  Authors Shi Ligong and 
Jiang Jiangang of the China Pacific Insurance Company propose a 
strategy for protecting China's insurance industry against the 
"blow" of foreign competition that would result from joining GATT 
and the General Agreement on Trade in Services (GATS). 

   High premiums and the resultant high profits fostered by lack of 
competition in China's insurance industry have induced local 
government financial departments to "get into the insurance 
business" by buying newly established insurance company stock.  This 
conflict of interest is compounded by the fact that the state 
heavily regulates and subsidizes the insurance industry.  There is a 
30 percent "accounting maximum compensation rate" for insurance 
companies, and the actual "rate of compensation" is between 20 and 
30 percent compared to from 80 to over 100 percent in developed 
countries.  Moreover, the state requires that insurance capital be 
deposited in banks, and the People's Bank of China in turn strictly 
regulates the investment of this capital.  In 1991 China's level of 
"insurance working capital" was 8 percent, compared to an 85-percent 
rate in developed countries.  Insurance companies are also required 
to take on "policy-oriented," high-risk insurance ventures, such as 
agricultural insurance and export credit guarantees.  Shortfalls are 
made up by government subsidies, but "monopolistic" profits from 
very high insurance premiums are also heavily taxed by the 
government. 

   China's insurance industry is not transparent and lacks a 
complete legal framework.  Currently only portions of one law, the 
"Contract Law," and two administrative regulations, "Temporary 
Regulations on Insurance Company Management" and "Regulations on 
Property Insurance Contracts," regulate the insurance industry. 
Moreover, the regulations were promulgated when China People's 
Insurance Company was a monopoly and are therefore out-of-date.  The 
authors state that it is imperative for China to promulgate the 
"Insurance Law," "Detailed Regulations for Implementing the 
Insurance Law," "Measures for Managing Insurance Brokers," and 
"Measures for Managing Foreign and Sino-foreign Joint Venture 
Insurance Companies" as quickly as possible in order to take 
advantage of a GATS grandfather clause which gives precedence to 
existing domestic legislation when the GATS agreement goes into 
effect. 

   The authors also believe China can take advantage of GATS special 
policies on developing countries and infant industries to protect 
China's insurance industry from the onslaught of foreign 
competition.  They also mention GATT restrictions and exceptions for 
developing countries, in particular those regarding helping 
developing countries develop service industries.  The authors 
believe that developed countries will be willing to give China 
monetary and technical assistance in opening up its insurance 
market.  (Beijing GUOJI MAOYI 15 Jan 94 pp 36-39, 25 and Beijing 
GUOJI JINGMAO XIAOXI 14, 21, 28 December 93) 

   CEI Database Reports 1993 Foreign Trade Figures 

BOT 

                          Imports             Exports 
                          1993     1992       1993       1992 

TOTAL ($million)         103,950   80,610    91,763     84,998 

North America            12,196    10,941    18,318     20,232 
(including Mexico) 
   United States         10,688    8,900     16,964     17,494 

Europe                   23,795    16,096    16,426     11,364 
   EC                    14,232    9,813     11,693     7,601 
   France                1,465     1,496     1,291      764 
   Germany               6,040     4,023     3,968      2,448 
   U.K.                  1,664     1,014     1,929      923 

   Other West Europe     2,538     1,811     977        718 
   E. Europe and Eurasia 7,026     4,472     3,756      3,045 
   Russia                4,987     3,526     2,692      2,336 

East Asia/Pacific        58,663    47,373    48,190     57,962 
   ASEAN                 5,996     4,204     4,683      4,262 
   Hong Kong             10,473    20,538    22,064     37,512 
   Japan                 23,253    13,681    15,579     11,699 
   North Korea           297       155       602        541 
   South Korea           5,360     2,623     2,860      2,437 
   Taiwan                12,933    5,881     1,462      698 

South Asia*              697       418       1,742      1,350 

Mid-East/North Africa**  2,245     1,081     2,895      2,236 
   Iran                  310       101       403        336 
   Saudi Arabia          119       127       579        444 

Sub-Saharan Africa       789       95        1,121      881 

Latin America/Caribbean   1,806     1,786     1,620      1,438 
   Brazil                 863       519       192        584 
   Chile                  282       410       204        128 
   Cuba                   74        183       177        200 

Oceania                   2,359     2,059     1,231      2,754 
  Australia               1,949     1,671     1,061      2,332 

*South Asia: Afghanistan, Bangladesh, Bhutan, Burma, India, Nepal, 
Pakistan, Sri Lanka. 

**Mid East/North Africa: Algeria, Bahrain, Cyprus, Egypt, Iran, 
Iraq, Israel, Jordan, Kuwait, Lebanon, Libya, Morocco, Oman, 
Palestine, Qatar, Saudi Arabia, Syria, Tunisia, Turkey, UAE, Yemen. 

EOT 

   Hong Kong Firm To Build Toll Roads in Guangdong - Hoi Sing 
Holdings Limited has signed a letter of intent to build two toll 
roads in Guangdong's Xinhui City with a total investment of HK$400 
million.  Hoi Sing will hold 65 percent of the equity, while its 
partner, Xinhui City Highway Construction Company, will have 35 
percent.  Completion is estimated to take two years.  In addition to 
the highway construction project, Hoi Sing is also building a coke 
plant in Guizhou Province.  Hoi Sing hopes to promote its 
construction business in mainland China through its links with one 
of its major shareholders, the PRC-owned Shougang Concord Grand 
(Group) Limited.  (Hong Kong HSIN PAO 7 Feb 94 p 2) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Guoco Group Invests in Shanghai Real Estate Development - Despite 
Beijing's attempts to slow fixed-asset investment on the mainland, 
Hong Kong-based Guoco Group has announced its involvement in a $25 
million investment in a residential and office development in 
Shanghai.  Guoco, whose banking activities in Hong Kong include Dao 
Heng Bank and the Overseas Trust Bank, will invest in the project 
through its Guoco Properties subsidiary, which will have a 90 
percent stake in the project in conjunction with Shanghai Hai Tong 
Construction, which holds the remaining 10 percent.  Guoco 
properties is 40 percent owned by the Guoco group, with the 
remaining equity held by the Singapore-listed First Capital 
Corporation with 30 percent and Malaysia's Hong Leong Properties, 
which also has 30 percent.  (Hong Kong HONG KONG STANDARD (FINANCIAL 
REVIEW) 9 Feb 94 p 3)  Hong Kong Bureau 

   Lei Shing Invests HK$1 Billion To Redevelop Shanghai District - 
Wu Sung, chairman and director of Lei Shing International Company 
Limited, has announced that the company's plan to develop Shanghai's 
Town God Temple area will involve a total investment of HK$1 
billion.  The company plans to build hotels and shopping arcades. 
Construction of the shopping arcades, which will cover an area of 
100,000 square meters, is scheduled to begin in April. (Hong Kong 
HSIN PAO 16 Feb 94 p 2) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Jardines Said Unaffected by Sino-British Relations - A recent 
report from Standard Chartered Securities has encouraged investors 
to buy Jardine Matheson stock and not to be influenced by the 
present political climate.  The report says that China's 
relationship with Jardine Matheson is mutually beneficial.  For this 
reason, Jardine has been expanding its business in mainland China 
despite the deterioration in Sino-British relations.  Jardine now 
has over 40 joint ventures in China and 6-10 percent of its profits 
come from businesses in the mainland.  (Hong Kong MING PAO 16 Feb 94 
p B2) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Hong Kong Exports for Outward Processing Rise 10 Percent in 3d 
Quarter - Hong Kong's exports to China intended for outward 
processing there rose 10 percent on a year-on-year basis to HK$41.1 
billion in the third quarter of last year, representing 47.2 percent 
of the territory's total exports in that period.  Statistics 
released by the Census and Statistics Department revealed that this 
was 6.9 percent lower than in the same period of 1992.  A spokesman 
for the statistics department said this was due to increased 
domestic demand in China for imported goods.  During the third 
quarter, imports from China involving outward processing there were 
valued at HK$81.1 billion, or 73 percent of Hong Kong's total 
imports from the mainland.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST 
(BUSINESS POST) 18 Feb 94 p 2) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Record Foreign Capital Contracts in Sichuan in 1993 - Some 1,910 
foreign-funded enterprises with contracted capital of $2.4 billion 
were approved in Sichuan Province last year, surpassing the total 
foreign capital introduced in the previous 13 years.  The funds came 
primarily from Hong Kong, Macao, South Korea, and Thailand and were 
concentrated in capital- and technology- intensive industries, 
including energy, transport, and communications and in renovation of 
major productive enterprises. 

   The province also saw an expansion of international cooperation 
and exchanges, with friendly city relations established with 33 
cities from 14 countries and economic and trade relations with 120 
countries and regions set up.  Labor and foreign contracted projects 
expanded to include transport, geological prospecting, mining, 
machinery, construction, and medicine.  Imports and exports for the 
province totaled $2.9 billion in 1993, a 32 percent increase over 
1992.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1110 GMT 2 Feb 94) Hong Kong 
Bureau 

   Tianjin Approves Record Number of Foreign-Funded Enterprises in 
January - In January, Tianjin approved 223 foreign-funded 
enterprises, with a contracted amount of investment exceeding $500 
million, of which over $300 million will be from foreign investors. 
Both the total investment and the foreign investment were new 
records for the month.  It approved 16 large projects each involving 
more than $5 million and with a total investment of $290 million, 
accounting for 58 percent of Tianjin's total.  The volume of exports 
was $150 million, up 23 percent from the same period in 1993. 
Tianjin has six units with the authority to undertake contracted 
projects and labor service abroad.  In January, they signed 51 
contracts worth $29.4 million for construction projects and labor 
service abroad.  (Tianjin TIANJIN RIBAO 1 Feb 94 p 1)  Seoul Bureau 

   Guangdong Has Nearly 4,500 Foreign-Invested Enterprises - At the 
end of 1993, Guangdong had 4,475 foreign-invested enterprises, with 
investment totaling $131.49 billion and registered capital amounting 
to $84.2 billion.  Of the foreign-invested enterprises, 1,200 had 
1993 registered capital of over $10 million each and 49 had capital 
of over $100 million each.  Fourteen foreign enterprise were engaged 
in expressway construction in Foshan, Huizhou, and Chaozhou cities. 
Total output value of Guangdong's foreign-invested enterprises 
constitutes 33.8 percent of the province's total industrial output 
value.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 0952 GMT 15 Feb 94) Hong 
Kong Bureau 

   Hebei Preferential Policies Attract Foreign Investment - Hebei 
formulated preferential policies and simplified procedures to 
provide a better environment for foreign firms to invest in the 
province.  In 1993, the province developed 1,879 new foreign-funded 
enterprises, equivalent to the total of the previous four years, for 
a total of 3,798 registered foreign-funded enterprises.  Investment 
totaled $7.7 billion, and registered capital $5.1 billion, of which, 
$2.4 billion is to be supplied by foreigners.  The number of large 
foreign-funded projects increased in the newly-founded enterprises. 
A total of 63 individual projects have investment levels exceeding 
$10.  Foreign investment in the primary and tertiary industries 
increased from 10 percent of the total to 14.8 percent.  Foreign 
investment in Hebei came from 58 countries and regions. 
(Shijiazhuang HEBEI RIBAO 26 Jan 94 p 1) Seoul Bureau 
Liaoning Foreign-Funded Enterprises Increase in 1993 - By the end 
of 1993, Liaoning had approved 7,895 foreign-funded enterprises, 
with the contracted amount of investment totaling $16.85 billion. 
Of these enterprises, 2,506 were already put into operation to 
create 18.4 billion yuan in output value, up 58.9 percent from 1992; 
to create 909 million yuan in profits; to pay 801 million yuan in 
taxes; and to earn $1.134 billion from exports, amounting to 26.62 
percent of the province's total and increasing by 41.1 percent from 
1992.  In 1993, Dalian city approved 1,722 projects using foreign 
capital, and the contracted amount of foreign funds totaled $1.91 
billion, up 100 percent and 60.5 percent, respectively, over 1992. 
Of these projects, 1,655 were directly invested by foreign firms, 
and the contracted amount of foreign capital was $1.78 billion, up 
110 percent and 79.2 percent, respectively.  (Shenyang LIAONING 
RIBAO 18 Jan 94 p 1) 

   BASF Invests in Nanjing Joint-Venture Polystyrene Plant - German 
chemical giant BASF on 3 February announced plans to invest 250 
million deutschemarks in a joint venture in Nanjing to produce 
polystyrene primarily for the Chinese domestic market.  The joint 
venture with the Nanjing-based Yangzi Petrochemical Corporation is 
BASF's fifth large project in China and brings its total investment 
there to more than 600 million marks, making BASF the second largest 
German investor in China after Volkswagen.  BASF chairman Jurgen 
Strube said that China's recent economic growth and its expected 
entry into GATT made it mandatory for a company of BASF's size to 
have production facilities on the mainland.  High production costs 
in North America and Europe, he said, make it virtually impossible 
for chemical companies to rely on exports alone to supply the China 
market.  Even with removal of high import duties on styrene, which 
would be required by entry into GATT, it would still be cheaper to 
produce inside China. 

   Strube noted that because all raw materials for the project would 
be supplied locally, BASF would not have to worry too much about 
major exchange rate fluctuations.  He did concede, however, that 
inflation might be a problem.  Production at the plant was expected 
to begin in mid-1996, with a scheduled capacity of 100,000 tonnes. 
In 1992, China's consumption of polystyrene was 350,000 tonnes, 
nearly 70 percent of which was imported.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA 
MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 4 Feb 94 p 6) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Taiwan Investment in Guangxi Increases in 1993 - Guangxi has 
rapidly increased use of Taiwan funds.  Last year, 219 new Taiwan- 
funded enterprises were set up in the autonomous region, and Taiwan 
investors planned to make a total investment of over $250 million. 
Lei Yu, vice chairman of the autonomous regional government, said 
yesterday that in 1993, Guangxi also received over 120,000 Taiwan 
visitors last year.  The scope of Taiwan investment extended from 
elementary processing and farming to electronics, chemical, medical, 
tourist, and real estate industries, and the locations of investment 
also extended from coastal and major cities to such remote areas as 
Hechi and Baise.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0800 GMT 5 Feb 94) 
Hong Kong Bureau 

   Australian Group Launches Joint Resort Project in Hainan - An 
Australian enterprise group responsible for designing a Gold Coast 
project in Australia joined with a real estate development company 
in Hainan in launching a holiday resort construction project in 
Guilinyang on the east coast of Hainan Island.  The project will 
require a total investment of 500 million yuan, and some Taiwan and 
Australian financial institutions and yacht clubs will finance the 
project, which is expected to be completed in five years.  After 
completion, a holiday resort similar to ones on Australia's Gold 
Coast will be the sole large-scale comprehensive holiday 
recreational community of international standards in South China. 
(Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0929 GMT 7 Feb 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Mainland Chemical Firm Plans Hong Kong Listing - Yizheng Chemical 
Fibre Company, the world's fourth largest manufacturer of polyester 
and one of the biggest chemical companies in China, plans to issue H 
shares on the Hong Kong Stock Exchange in March.  According to the 
Jiangsu-based company's agenda, H shares, which are shares of 
Chinese companies listed in Hong Kong and thus traded outside China, 
will be issued in mid-March.  Shares for domestic investors, A 
shares, which are traded inside China, will be listed on the 
Shanghai Stock Exchange in May.  The company is presently engaged in 
a $421 million investment program which will raise the company's 
annual production capacity to 1 million tonnes by 1995.  Last year, 
the firm produced 545,000 tonnes of polyester with total sales of 
4.94 billion yuan, profits of 1.05 billion yuan, and export earnings 
of $37.2 million. (Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 30 Jan 94 p 
1) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Trade Volume in Pudong's New District Accelerated in 1993 - 
Recent statistics show that in 1993 foreign trade conducted in 
Pudong's New District totaled $2.592 billion, which is equivalent to 
18.5 percent of Shanghai's total trade.  Imports and exports by 
joint venture companies in the amount of $1.062 billion constituted 
41 percent of the total trade in the new district.  With export 
earnings of $190 million in 1993, these joint venture companies have 
already become a principal player in Pudong's export trade. (Beijing 
JINGJI RIBAO 30 Jan p 1) 

   Mainland Investors Return to Surging Hong Kong Real Estate Market 
- Both the commercial and residential property markets continued 
their upward surge in January, and the reappearance of large-scale 
purchases by PRC-funded firms emerged as a major factor driving the 
real estate market to new heights.  In an article on page 7 of the 
SUNDAY MORNING POST (SUNDAY MONEY)on 30 January, Kennis Chu examined 
the renewed influence of investors from mainland China in the Hong 
Kong property market.  According to Chu, Chinese investment has 
risen noticeably since November 1993, when credit controls imposed 
in July of last year by Vice Premier Zhu Rongji to cool inflation 
were relaxed.  Property prices have reached record highs, 
particularly for Grade-A office space and luxury apartments.  The 
article states that Chinese participation in the real estate market 
can be divided into three types: central government enterprises, 
such as CITIC and China Merchants Holdings; companies owned by 
provincial governments like Guangdong Investment and Sichuan's 
Jianling (HK); and city and village-owned companies, such as 
Foshan's China Weal, Huiyang, and Pripenic. 

   In a front-page article in the 2 February issue of the SOUTH 
CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST), Barry Porter cites a report by 
real estate consultant First Pacific Davies which puts the volume of 
recorded transactions in January at HK$17.32 billion and estimates 
an additional $5 billion in private transactions.  The article 
points out that this exceeds the previous monthly record of HK$12 
billion set in May 1993, a month in which there was an 
"unprecedented surge in buying by mainland corporations," a spree 
which Porter asserts was "partly responsible" for Zhu Rongji's July 
austerity program.  The article goes on to state that mainland 
corporations are buying Hong Kong property as a hedge against a 
further devaluation of the yuan.  However, most of the major 
publicly recorded purchases have been by completed by listed Hong 
Kong-based firms, such as Hong Kong China, controlled by the Lippo 
group, which paid HK$2.2 billion for an apartment block in the Mid 
Levels area; Lai Sun Group, which bought a Tsimshatsui office 
building for HK$1.4 billion; and Great Eagle, which paid HK$2 
billion for the Ramada Renaissance Hotel, also in Tsimshatsui. 
The SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) on 29 January 
reports on page one that, in an effort to reduce its exposure to the 
residential property market, the territory's leading lender has 
further tightened its policies on the provision of mortgages for 
"luxury" apartments costing more than HK$5 million.  Hongkong Bank 
announced that from 29 January, the mortgage lending ratio for 
properties worth $5 million or above would be reduced to 50 percent 
from 60 percent.  The ratio for those priced below $5 million 
remains at 70 percent.  However, a report carried by the Hong Kong- 
based PRC-affiliated news agency ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese at 
0912 GMT on 30 January states that the Bank of China (BOC) Group had 
no intention of following Hongkong Bank for the moment.  The report 
said that the BOC would closely watch the market's reaction and 
developments in the field.  An official with the BOC Group said that 
they would not require their 13 subsidiary banks to follow the same 
rules in arranging mortgages; instead, the banks would be allowed to 
decide their own policy according to their particular financial 
resources.  Hong Kong Bureau 

   Taiwan:  Enterprise Groups Establish Close Relations With 
Southeast Asian Nations -- Cooperative relations between Taiwan- 
based enterprises and PRC businessmen in Southeast Asia have become 
increasingly close.  This is expected to benefit the Taiwanese 
Government's current pursuit of its southern strategy.  Leading 
Taiwan enterprise groups that have close ties with commercial and 
political circles in Southeast Asian nations include the China Trust 
Group, the President Group, and the Foong Chun Group in Thailand; 
the Tuntex Group in Thailand and the Philippines; the Far East 
Textile Group and the Chun Yuan Iron and Steel Group in Malaysia; 
the Evergreen Shipping Group and the Walsin Linhwa Wireless Cable 
Group in Indonesia; and the Pacific Wire and Cable Group in Hong 
Kong.  These business groups are said to have played an active role 
as go-betweens in arranging visits by Taiwan Government leaders to 
Southeast Asia, including the recent trip by Premier Lien Chan and 
the current tour by President Li Teng-hui.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH- 
PAO 7 Feb 94 p 2) Okinawa Bureau 

   National Bank Sets Goal for Money Supply Growth at 10-15 Percent 
in 1994 - The Central Bank of China (CBC) has decided to maintain 
its current moderately flexible money policy and set its goal for 
money supply growth at 10-15 percent in 1994.  Once growth exceeds 
the 15 percent ceiling, the CBC will take measures to tighten credit 
so as to ensure local commodity prices remain stable.  A CBC 
official said prices are projected to grow at an annual rate of 3.62 
percent this year, slightly higher than the 2.94 percent registered 
in 1993.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 4 Feb 94 p 2) Okinawa Bureau 

   Economic Planning Official Expounds on Creating Operational 
Center - At a monthly Kuomintang meeting on 7 February, Vincent 
Siew, chairman of the Council for Economic Planning and Development, 
presented a report on the proposition of developing Taiwan into an 
operational center in the Asia-Pacific region.  Siew pointed out 
that efforts to develop Taiwan as the Asia-Pacific region's 
operational center would be adversely affected if economic ties with 
the PRC are not further enhanced.  Therefore, he called for a timely 
adjustment of cross-Strait economic and trade policies, as well as 
removal of undue restrictions.  He disclosed that his council has 
studied a set of ideas on how to achieve the goal of establishing 
the Asia-Pacific operational center and its attendant problems in 
connection with cross-Strait relations, as well as efforts to 
establish direct links with the PRC and how to resolve the relevant 
interlocking problems.  To achieve the goal of establishing the 
operational center, Siew put forward detailed measures that should 
be taken, calling for all-out efforts to gain accession to the 
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT).  (Taipei CHING-CHI 
JIH-PAO 8 Feb 94 p 2) Okinawa Bureau 

   Impact of U.S. Lifting Embargo on Vietnam Viewed - With President 
Clinton's lifting of the 19-year old trade embargo against Vietnam, 
Taiwan is prepared to take advantage of its superior position as the 
largest foreign investor in Vietnam to increase efforts to develop 
the Vietnamese market.  Vincent Siew, chairman of the Council for 
Economic Planning and Development, said the U.S. move is bound to 
enhance cooperation and joint ventures between Taiwan and U.S. 
businessmen in Vietnam, thereby further strengthening economic and 
trade relations between the Republic of China (ROC) and the United 
States. 

   So far, the Vietnamese Government has approved more than 800 
projects funded by foreign investors with investments totaling $7 
billion, out of which $1.3 billion come from Taiwan.  Of the 10 
major foreign-invested projects in Vietnam, six are invested in by 
Taiwan-based enterprises, making Taiwan the number one foreign 
investor there, with interests concentrated mainly in tourism, 
imports and exports, and production.  According to the Board of 
Foreign Trade, bilateral trade leaped from approximately $1 million 
six years ago to $600 million last year, showing a growth of 654 
percent (as published) within six years.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 
5 Feb 94 p 1, 10) Okinawa Bureau 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Steel Firms Facing Changing Global Market 
- SUMMARY:  South Korea's price competitive edge in steel production 
is gradually shrinking, and ROK steel manufacturers lag behind 
advanced countries with regard to technology development, according 
to several reports from a Seoul daily.  Changes in the global market 
in the next 10 years will create new competitors and challenges for 
the industry.  ROK firms must prepare themselves in order to 
maintain their current position in the market, the paper says. 

   Three related articles in the 22 January HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 
(HKS) explore the status of ROK steel producers and the challenges 
they will face as the global market changes over the next 10 years. 
HKS notes that domestic steel firms are still competitive globally 
because of lower labor and manufacturing costs.  In 1991, the ROK's 
daily steel production per square meter of blast furnace volume was 
2.09 tons, compared with Japan's 2.03 tons.  That year ROK producers 
used 489 kg of bituminous coal per ton of melted iron, compared with 
515 kg for Japan.  Current ROK labor costs for ROK cold-rolled steel 
are only 60 percent of U.S. costs.  Thus even when raw materials 
costs are about equal, ROK production costs are about 18.7 percent 
lower than U.S. costs.  However, HKS points out that the rising cost 
of ROK labor is narrowing the ROK's price competitive edge.  From 
1988 through 1992, ROK steel firms saw an average annual wage 
increase of 16.6 percent, while production rose on average by only 
8.9 percent. 
   Although firms raised the level of their process technologies, 
they still lag behind producers in advanced countries with regard to 
technology development.  According to an industrial S and T research 
institute affiliated with POSCO (Pohang Iron and Steel Co.), South 
Korea trails Japan in automated and special steel production, and 
ROK steel technology is currently five to six years behind Japanese 
technology.  HKS reports that in 1992 the average rate of automation 
of ROK steel production was 53.1 percent, which was lower than 
Japan's 1990 rate.  In 1992, only 8.2 percent of ROK-produced steel 
was special steels. 

   ROK steel firms will be further challenged in the next 10 years, 
as producers develop and utilize innovative production technologies, 
and as steel firms in advanced countries undergo structural 
adjustments, HKS reports.  One new technology being developed is the 
melting reduction process, in which iron ore and coal are fed 
directly into the blast furnace to produce melted ore.  If 
commercialized, the process will greatly reduce plant investment and 
production costs.  Other new technologies include strip and thick- 
slab casting, which also can reduce production costs.  According to 
HKS, cold-rolled steel made with thick-slab technology is 28 percent 
less expensive than that made using the blast furnace method.  The 
paper points out that the rapid expansion of steel-producing 
facilities in developing countries will become another variable in 
the market,  To cut costs, strengthen their competitiveness, and 
maintain their current market position, ROK steel producers must 
adjust their structures and develop innovative technologies, HKS 
concludes. 

   POSCO, whose annual production can satisfy domestic demand, plans 
to raise its steel quality to world-class levels, according to HKS. 
It will focus on developing production technologies, investing 28 
billion won ($35 million) in melting reduction technology and 52.2 
billion won ($65.25 million) in strip casting technology.  POSCO 
hopes to use the latter in its production process by 1998.  By 1996, 
POSCO will build a thick slab plant (annual capacity, 1 million 
tons) at its Kwangyang facility.  HKS reports that in 1993 P0SCO 
invested an amount equal to 1.5 percent of sales to develop high 
value-added products, and intends td raise this investment to equal 
2.1 percent of sales by 1996.  The company will also change its 
distribution structure, raising the percentage of materials and 
products transported by ship to 38 percent, compared to 28 percent 
in 1993.  It will reduce distribution costs to 9.7 percent of sales 
(compared to 11.5 percent in 1993), according to HKS.  Finally, 
POSCO is developing overseas resources in order to expand its 
supplies of iron ore and bituminous coal, and will increase its 
local investment in China, Vietnam, and Southeast Asia. 

   POSCO is not alone in increasing its direct investment in these 
areas.  The 5 January HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN reports that ROK steel 
firms are expected to increase their direct investment overseas, as 
they face rising labor costs at home and observe the growing demand 
for steel in China and Southeast Asia.  POSCO's efforts include 
negotiating for a 50:50 joint-venture tin plate plant (annual 
capacity: 20,000 tons; cost: $102 million) in Shanghai and a 50:50 
joint-venture cold-rolled steel plant (annual capacity: 150-200,000 
tons; cost: $100 million) near Tianjin.  POSCO is currently building 
a steel pipe factory (annual capacity: 30,000 tons) and a 
reinforcing bar factory (annual capacity: 20,000 tons) in Hanoi. 
Koyang and Pusan Pipe are working with POSCO on these projects.  HKS 
notes that Dongyang Tin Plate Industrial Company plans to conclude a 
70:30 joint venture agreement with Benxi Steel.  The company will 
build a tin plate plant (annual capacity: 150,000 tons; cost: $60 
million) in Benxi, Liaoning.  Hanbo Steel is constructing thick slab 
and reinforcing bar plants in Asan, ROK, and plans to transfer its 
Pusan plant facilities to Tianjin.  It is currently negotiating with 
Tianjin City on construction of a reinforcing bar plant (annual 
capacity: 1 million tons).  Korea Steel Pipe, Vietnam Steel, and 
Daewoo are negotiating the construction of a steel pipe plant 
(annual capacity: 50,000 tons) in Ho Chi Minh City. 

   Yet even if ROK steel firms alter their production structures and 
work to develop new technologies, they will still face problems. 
The 30 December HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN reports that many of the new 
technologies being developed require scrap iron as an input, and 
that currently the domestic supply of scrap iron is insufficient to 
meet demand.  In the first nine months of 1993, ROK steel producers 
consumed 10.639 million tons of scrap iron, and had to procure 4.37 
million tons of it abroad.  While the amount supplied domestically 
rose by 14.5 percent, scrap iron imports rose by 55.8 percent. 
According to HKS, ROK dependence on imported scrap iron climbed from 
33.4 percent in 1992 to 41.1 percent in the first three quarters of 
1993.  At the same time, demand for scrap iron rose in the United 
States--the world's largest producer of the material; thus, it is 
now difficult to obtain quality scrap iron, and there are even 
rumors of a possible "embargo" on scrap iron exports. 

   HKS predicts that problems with scrap iron supplies will probably 
continue, as the number of thick slab casters, who use scrap iron as 
an input, grows from two at present to an estimated 44 worldwide by 
1996.  The expected supply-demand imbalance for scrap iron has kept 
all ROK electric furnace steel producers--except Hanbo--f rom 
bringing in thick-slab casting technology, according to HKS.  Even 
so, steel producers expect scrap iron supplies to continue to be a 
problem for some time, as growth in production capacity (39.4 
percent in 1992) continues over the next two to three years and the 
growth in stockpiled steel (9.9 percent in 1992) is unable to keep 
up.  To address the problem, experts suggest that South Korea 
systematize scrap iron recycling, expand its scrap iron collection 
and processing sites, revamp the distribution process, and work to 
increase the use of alternatives to scrap iron. 

   FEATURE:  New Approach To Collecting Foreign S and T Information 
Noted - SUMMARY:  Cooperative research agreements with foreign 
institutes, although numerous, have failed to provide the commercial 
technology South Korea needs to stay competitive, according to the 
head of a leading ROK research institute whose remarks are reported 
in the Seoul press.  The broad, general approach characteristic of 
ROK collection efforts to date will be replaced, in part, by a new 
program in which methods and goals are tailored to the realities of 
the target country. 

   South Korea's "cooperative" links with foreign research 
institutes will be expanded this year, while a concurrent effort is 
made to exploit these connections in ways commensurate with the 
ROK's real needs, according to reports in the 29 December and 24 
January MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS).  Addressing a symposium held 28 
December and titled "Building the New Economy, and a Strategy for 
Internationalizing R and D," the director of the Korea Institute of 
Science and Technology (KIST) complained that "cooperative research" 
with other countries gives the appearance of being vigorous, but in 
fact is "much too weak."  In his view, the practical consequences of 
agreements made between ROK state-funded research institutes and 
foreign S and T establishments in particular have been 
unsatisfactory. 

   For example, a total of 48.3 billion won ($60 million) was 
"invested" by South Korea between 1985-92 in 260 international 
projects.  However, the nature of these projects or the manner of 
their execution differed, in the director's opinion, from what 
"joint international research" should be. The KIST official was 
especially concerned about the difficulty South Korean research 
institutes have keeping leading foreign scientists on the job.  Some 
94 percent reportedly leave their projects before one month, because 
South Korea lacks "ways to retain them," the 29 December MKS 
reports. 

   On 24 January, the same newspaper reported a "concrete plan"--to 
rectify these problems through "strategic technical cooperation" 
with the United States, Japan, and other advanced countries--laid 
out in such a way as to increase the international competitiveness 
of ROK products.  According to this "Plan To Strengthen Strategic 
Cooperation With Technically Advanced Foreign Countries," devised by 
the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE), the following 
projects and technologies are to be sought: 

   United States - "Cooperation" will be pursued in selected areas 
of advanced technology.  A "ROK-U.S. Commercial Technology 
Cooperation Foundation" will be established early this year within 
the Federation of Korean Industries, through which South Korea will 
try to form "cooperative systems" with U.S. companies in 
semiconductors, computers, machine tools, aviation, communications 
gear, medical machinery and instruments, and environmental 
equipment. 

   Japan - South Korea will discontinue its former pattern of 
importing Japanese technology for machinery, shipbuilding, and other 
heavy industries, and pursue technical training for employees of 
small and medium business in high-tech areas, such as multimedia and 
databases, through the Information Technology Research Institute. 

   China - An industrial cooperation committee will be formed to 
discuss technical cooperation in automobiles, time-division exchange 
(TDX) switching systems, and aviation.  Talks will also be held on 
commercializing PRC technology through use of ROK capital and 
production technology. 

   Russia - Support for "joint research" aimed at transferring 
Russian high-tech to the ROK will be increased from 500 million won 
($625,000) to 2.7 billion won ($3.4 million) in 1994.  Investment 
will focus on commercialization of advanced technology. 

   France - A "technical cooperation roundtable conference" between 
South Korea and France will be held in Paris early in 1994, the 
first of its kind between the two countries.  Also, an industrial 
cooperation committee will be set up with a focus on aviation, 
space, and nuclear power. 

   Australia - The first "technical cooperation workshop" between 
South Korea and Australia will be held this year in Canberra.  A 
"joint research committee" will be formed to promote cooperation in 
electronics and communications. 

   FEATURE:  Record Growth Reported in Private Research Institutes - 
SUMMARY:  The year 1993 saw a record increase in the number of 
private ROK company-affiliated research institutes, according to a 
survey cited in the Seoul press.  Some 84 percent of the growth was 
recorded in the fields of electronics, machinery and metals, and 
chemicals.  Continuation of the present "boom" in construction of 
new laboratories, and the ability of South Korean companies to 
create new, competitive products will depend on increased government 
subsidies and the timely transfer of foreign technology. 

   According to a survey by the Korea Industrial Technology 
Promotion Association, reported in the 14 January MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN (MKS) and the 2 February CHUGAN MAEGYONG, the number of 
private research laboratories established by South Korean companies 
is rising, in response to government incentives, and as the 
companies recognize the importance of R and D to their businesses. 
The survey found that 297 private R and D institutes were set up in 
1993 and 42 closed, for a net gain of 255.  Broken down by field, 
123 (41.4 percent) of the new facilities were for electricity and 
electronics, 70 (23.6 percent) were for machinery and metals, and 56 
(18.8 percent) were for chemicals. 

   The survey further noted that 1993's increase in private R and D 
institutes was the largest on record, continuing a "boom" that began 
in the 1990's with more than 250 new facilities established both in 
1991 and 1992.  The past year's growth brings the total number of 
company-owned research labs now operating in South Korea to 1,690. 
Some 300 more are expected by the end of this year.  The following 
data published in MKS pertain: 

   Growth of ROK Company-Affiliated R and D Institutes 


                 Year           Institutes        Personnel 

                 1984               163             6,917 
                 1985               204             9,226 
                 1986               317            12,576 
                 1987               503            16,174 
                 1988               674            18,038 
                 1989               824            22,506 
                 1990               966            26,851 
                 1991             1,201            33,768 
                 1992             1,435            38,643 
                 1993             1,690            43,872 



   CHUGAN MAEGYONG reports that of the 1,690 private labs, 655 (39.3 
percent) are involved in electrical and electronics research, 402 
(23.8 percent) in machinery and metals, 381 (22.5 percent) in 
chemical research, 58 (3.4 percent) in foods, and 34 (2.0 percent) 
in textiles.  By the end of 1993, the 43,872 people working at these 
institutes represented more than half of the 76,000 researchers 
estimated to be employed in South Korea totally.  Some 3.8 percent 
of the company-affiliated researchers have PhD's, the magazine 
notes. 

   Many large ROK corporations operate more than one research 
facility, such as Goldstar which has nine separate labs and Samsung 
Electronics which runs more than 10.  Several conglomerates have 
consolidated, group-level R and D facilities besides the ones run by 
subsidiary companies.  Smaller firms are also "rushing" to set up 
labs, CHUGAN MAEGYONG reports: 247 of last year's 297 new facilities 
belong to small and medium businesses, which now operate 1,113 or 66 
percent of the nation's total.  The shifting balance is also 
reflected in the ratio of annual R and D expenditures made by large 
versus smaller ROK corporations, from 88-12 in 1985, to 60-40 in 
1987, and over 50 percent in 1989. 

   According to the magazine, annual R and D outlays by company- 
affiliated institutes rose between 1981 and 1993 from 140 billion 
won ($175 million) to 3.7 trillion won ($4.625 billion), stimulated 
by government incentives such as tax deductions, employee exemptions 
from military conscription, import tax immunities on research 
equipment, and "similar types of support policies."  Nevertheless, 
last year's total private research expenditures are said by CHUGAN 
MAEGYONG to be less than that spent by a single major corporation in 
an "advanced country."  Accordingly, the magazine observes that it 
is not enough for South Korean companies to increase the amount of 
private capital allotted to research.  ROK "Government R and D 
subsidies" to private institutes, currently amounting to about 20 
percent of their total research expenditures, will also have to be 
raised. 

   Larger R and D budgets are only part of the solution.  The 
magazine reports that South Korean firms are also setting up R and D 
facilities overseas in greater numbers to obtain "information on 
advanced technologies, to get the technology at an early date, and 
for timely development of new products."  Such overseas labs are 
established through legal corporations owned by parent ROK firms, 
and by acquisitions of local research institutes.  "More than 20" of 
these South Korean facilities are currently being operated in the 
United States alone, CHUGAN MAEGYONG reports. 

   FEATURE:  Samsung Moving Into Helicopter, Fixed-Wing Air 
Transport - SUMMARY:  Government attempts at promoting commercial 
helicopter transport to solve South Korea's traffic problems, while 
largely ineffective to date, may get a boost from Samsung, a Seoul 
business magazine suggests.  The company reportedly is willing to 
take losses providing domestic helicopter service to achieve its 
larger goal of breaking into the commercial air industry and 
becoming the country's third major carrier. 

   An ROK Government initiative in 1993 to expand commercial 
helicopter transport in South Korea has not generated a significant 
increase in demand, although this may soon change for reasons that 
have little to do with helicopters, according to the 29 December 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG. 

   The Seoul business magazine reports that toward the end of the 
1980's, the number of ROK firms involved in helicopter transport 
began increasing.  Air Korea, a subsidiary of Korea Air, started 
domestic service with a fleet of nine helicopters in 1986.  Two 
years later, several other companies began commercial helicopter 
flights over limited routes which, for national security reasons, do 
not include Seoul.  At present, nine ROK companies are licensed to 
make unscheduled domestic flights, but only two are actually 
providing services.  The remainder either lack the capital to get 
started or have been delayed for other reasons, CHUGAN MAEGYONG 
states. 

   Enter Samsung Aerospace.  According to the magazine's analysis 
based on "industry sources," Samsung plans to move "full-scale" into 
helicopter transport this year, despite probable losses, in order to 
fulfill its long-standing "dream" of becoming South Korea's "third 
commercial carrier."  In early 1994, Samsung reportedly will begin 
shuttle services with one 20-seat Super Puma helicopter.  By the end 
of the year, the fleet will have grown to five helicopters of 
various types, which will operate on routes between areas where the 
group's businesses are concentrated.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG states that by 
1997, Samsung will have more than 30 helicopters and 90 some pilots, 
along with 19- and 50-passenger fixed-wing aircraft (possibly from 
Canada Air and England's Jetstream Co.) for use on commercial 
routes.  The planned transition into regular, fixed-wing air 
transport helps explain, in the magazine's estimate, Samsung's early 
support for the ROK Government's program to manufacture indigenous 
small-to-medium size commercial aircraft, and the company's 
willingness to absorb losses in helicopter transport. 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG notes that the Ministry of Transportation is 
promoting helicopter and fixed-wing aircraft as a way to alleviate 
transportation bottlenecks, and to facilitate north-south 
communication when this becomes possible.  The ministry reportedly 
is discussing civilian use of military airports with the Defense 
Ministry, and may extend the age limit of used helicopters licensed 
for cargo transport from 10 years to 20 years. 
   The magazine provides the following information on present South 
Korean commercial air assets. 
                                Capital          Light          Air 
Company              Licensed   (mil $)  Planes  Planes  Helos 
Ships 
Total 


Korea Air          Dec  62  $267.5      94   10      2     1    107 
Asiana Air         Feb  88   250.0      26                      26 
Air Korea          Dec  86    10.0            2      9          11 
United Air Repair  May  88     2.5                   1           1 
Samsung Aerospace  Jun  88    52.4                   2            2 
Seoul Air          Nov  90     2.5                   5            5 
Hyundai Air        Nov  91   100.0                   2            2 
Daemyung Leisure   Feb  92     2.5                  (2)          (2) 
Pusan Air          Feb  93     2.5                  (2)          (2) 

Total                                   120  12     25     1    158 



   Japanese Newspaper Interviews Hyundai Motors CEO - Hyundai Motors 
President Chon Song-won made the following remarks during an 
interview with a reporter from Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN. 

   Hyundai exported 340,000 automobiles last year from a total 
production of 960,000 units, representing an increase of 25 percent 
in exports over 1992.  Export volume was divided about equally 
between the United States, Europe, and other areas, consistent with 
the company's goal of broadening its sales base.  Prior to 1993, 
Hyundai had to price its cars cheaper than Japanese exports to 
compete, but in Europe today, comparable models are selling for the 
same price.  Hyundai's 1994 production will reach 1.15 million 
units, which is full capacity.  By 2000, the company will be 
building 2 million cars annually. 

   U.S. sales, which reached 110,000 last year, will increase by 
10,000 to 20,000 units in 1994 because of the high yen value, 
improved quality, new models, and a larger dealer network.  China, 
too, "will become an extremely important market" which Hyundai will 
access through local production. 

   Hyundai sees its major task as improving technology.  The company 
is currently operating three research centers, and will build two 
more by 2000.  Hyundai's strategy is to develop some technology of 
its own, which it can trade for technology from foreign automobile 
manufacturers.  In the reporter's estimate, Hyundai's success will 
depend less on its ability to compete technologically than on 
keeping costs down.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 17 Jan 94 p 3) 

   Sunkyong Subsidiary Acquires U.S. Microfilm Factory - SKC, 
Limited, Sunkyong's main subsidiary and a major manufacturer of 
videotape, disks, and film products, has acquired the U.S. firm 
Anacom's Sunnyvale, California plant for $12.5 million.  SKC has 
been supplying Anacom, the world's largest producer of microfilm, 
with polyester film for its products since 1988, and had been 
negotiating with Anacom for two years in its effort to secure a 
U.S.-based production facility.  With an annual capacity of 6,000 
tons, the buyout gives SKC a potential sales increase of $50 
million, while serving as an "effective response to NAFTA."  SKC 
also owns a factory in New Jersey producing 2,400 tons of aluminum- 
coated film annually, and operates a videotape factory in China's 
Fujian Province.  The Anacom deal thus gives SKC its third "large- 
scale overseas production base" for magnetic recording media and 
high-density new materials.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 10 Dec 94 p 
8) 

   Korean-Language Software Development To Be Subsidized - South 
Korea's Ministry of Science and Technology (MOST) will step up plans 
to promote the domestic software industry, in order to head off an 
influx of foreign software products into South Korea, anticipated as 
a result of the Uruguay Round.  In March, a "Hangul Engineering 
Research Center" will be established to expedite development of core 
software, and direct research related to developing hangul (Korean 
script) information processing technology.  MOST is considering tax 
incentives, financial subsidies, and other measures aimed at 
concentrated support for developing the industry as quickly as 
possible.  The plan calls for "large-scale" public investment, 
measures to increase demand, and coordination between different 
government agencies, for example, by linking software development 
with the Ministry of Communications' high speed, mid-size computer 
project.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 24 Dec 94 p 12) 

   Government To Invest in Multimedia Industry - Between now and 
1998, the ROK Government will invest some 100 billion won ($125 
million) to bring the country's multimedia industry up to world 
standards.  Concentrated efforts will be made to develop information 
processing systems, portable information terminals, and multimedia 
titles and standard protocols.  The government will also revise 
regulations to encourage private development of the multimedia 
industry and permit broader participation by broadcasting and cable 
companies, and by news agencies.  According to a "Comprehensive Plan 
To Develop the Multimedia Industry" devised by the Ministry of 
Trade, Industry, and Energy, major emphasis will be placed on 
securing strategic technologies, developing and disseminating 
titles, improving laws and regulations, and stimulating demand. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 31 Dec 93 p 1) 

   Taehan Wool To Build Joint-Venture Plant in Vietnam - Taehan Wool 
has invested $4 million to build a joint-venture wool plant in 
Vietnam.  The company will soon conclude a 70:30 joint venture 
contract with the Vietnam National Silk Corporation.  Taehan plans 
to transfer its old weaving machines from South Korea to Vietnam. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 2 Feb 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau 

   Cement Companies Consider Building Plants in Pakistan, China - 
Ssangyong Cement Company has begun a feasibility study on building a 
1-million ton cement plant in Pakistan and is discussing the 
construction of a cement plant capable of producing 600,000 tons a 
year with Baoshan Steel Mill in Shanghai, China.  Tongyang Cement 
Company is also reportedly planning to build cement plants in 
Vietnam and in a Chinese special economic zone, and Asia Cement 
Company is studying the feasibility of building a 300,000-ton cement 
plant in Dalian, China.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 14 Feb 94 p 11) 
Seoul Bureau 

   Taebong Electronics To Open Plant in China in March - Taebong 
Electronics, a manufacturer of car radio tuners, will begin 
operating its tuner plant in Tianjin, China in March.  The plant can 
produce $1.5 million worth of tuners each month.  Taebong began 
construction of the 1,500-pyong plant in November 1993.  Another 
plant under construction in Indonesia is due to be completed this 
June.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 3 Feb 94 p 13) Seoul Bureau 

   Samsung Introduces Integrated Customer Service Plan for Europe - 
Samsung Electronics has begun full operation of its integrated 
after-sales service system in the European Union (EU) in a bid to 
make further inroads into the unified European market.  The "Samsung 
EU integrated service guarantee system" allows EU customers to 
receive the same after-sales services regardless of their 
nationality or location.  The company is issuing quality guarantee 
letters, containing translations in seven languages, which specify 
unified terms for warrantees and after-sales service.  Samsung now 
has a Euro-service headquarters in London that provides integrated 
services for EU consumers by coordinating its six sales 
subsidiaries.  (Seoul THE KOREA TIMES 9 Feb 94 p 8) Seoul Bureau 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  Trade Possibilities With Iran 
Reported - Iran's Heavy Industries Minister Nezhad Hosseinian 
recently announced that Iran and Indonesia plan to establish an 
aircraft assembly and shipbuilding venture.  While other details of 
the project are still to be worked out, the two sides agreed that 
the aircraft assembly plant which is being planned will use IPTN 
(Indonesian Aircraft Industry) components.  In exchange, Iran has 
offered Indonesia the use of its dockyards. 

   Indonesian Research and Technology Minister Habibie has announced 
that sometime between February and April, Indonesia will send a 10- 
member delegation to promote its own N-250 medium-range plane and to 
further discuss the aircraft assembly and shipbuilding venture. 
(Jakarta KOMPAS 12 Jan 94 p 4) 

   Taiwanese Companies To Relocate in Indonesia - Because of 
increasing labor costs, limited land area, and the "government's 
push to look south," a number of Taiwanese businessmen have decided 
to move their companies to Indonesia, according to Minister of State 
for Investment Sanyoto Sastrowardoyo.  Top Taiwainese entrepreneurs 
are interested in investing in large projects in steel, oil 
refinery, electric power, chemicals, and cement, the minister said. 
A memorandum of understanding between the two countries was signed 
during Sanyoto's recent visit, covering Taiwan's plan to invest in 
industrial components on Batam Island.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 14 
Jan 94 p 6) 

   Government's Position on Funding 'Mega-Projects' - Finance 
Minister Mar'ie Muhammad recently reaffirmed that the government 
will discontinue the practice of giving protection to domes tic- 
funded "mega-projects."  He added that the practice has undermined 
competitiveness and increased national expenditure.  (Jakarta BISNIS 
INDONESIA 13 Jan 94 p 1) 

   Official Comments on Natuna Gas Negotiations - Faisal Abda'oe, 
chairman of the Indonesian Government's negotiating team, said that 
current negotiations between Indonesia and Esso Oil Co., a 
subsidiary of EXXON, still center on the production-sharing split, 
and fiscal and legal matters.  Since Esso remains the "Natuna gas 
field operator" until 1996 when its earlier contract expires, 
Indonesia cannot look for other prospective contractors, Abda'oe 
said.  He noted that the Natuna gas exploitation project would 
involve a "very large amount" of investment because of the need to 
construct a refinery of "high technological capacity" to separate 
the various gases.  Natuna gas is 71 percent carbondioxide, 28 
percent hydrocarbon, 0.5 percent hydrogen, and 0.5 percent nitrogen. 
(Jakarta KOMPAS 26 Jan 94 p 7) 

   LAOS:  Malaysia To Invest in Agriculture, Forestry - Malaysia's 
Lao Timber Corporation plans to invest in a $45-million agriculture 
and forestry development project in southern Laos.  The company has 
reportedly completed aerial and ground surveys.  (Vientiane KPL 0806 
GMT 8 Feb 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   MALAYSIA:  FEATURE:  Government Outlines Strategies To Attract 
More Investment - SUMMARY:  Two Kuala Lumpur dailies recently 
reported that Malaysia has a "plan of action" to attract more 
investment in order to sustain its "impressive growth rate." 
"Specific strategies" have been outlined, and two additional areas 
for development have been identified, according to the papers. 

   The 16 January BERITA HARlAN and 18 January UTUSAN MALAYSIA 
report that despite a drop in foreign investment, tight labor 
supply, and infrastructure problems, Malaysia is determined to 
sustain its "impressive growth rate."  In order to do so, the 
government has drawn up "strategies" to create a more conducive 
investment climate. 

   Recognizing the growing competition for foreign investment from 
neighboring ASEAN countries, China, and Vietnam, the Malaysian 
Government  has decided to focus on getting local investors to 
participate in developing indigenous industrial and consumer goods, 
the papers say.  The government wants domestic corporations to 
innovate, design, produce, and market Malaysian products, processes, 
and services that will be competitive overseas.  To assist in this 
endeavor, the government has recently opened up two areas for 
development, where investments are being sought--the East Coast 
corridor and the East-West corridor. 

   The papers also report that the Malaysian Government intends to 
review the present overall incentive system for the manufacturing 
sector, to make it more "balanced" by providing incentives 
"selectively."  In addition, the government wants to provide an 
environment that will "enhance research capabilities" and "nurture 
innovations," according to the 17 January BERITA HARlAN.  Other 
strategies mentioned by the paper include: 

   --Developing industrial cooperation between multinational 
corporations and Malaysian companies 

   --Establishing a single agency to spearhead the development of 
small- and medium-sized industries to further strengthen the 
industrial sector 

   --Encouraging heavy and strategic industries to expand and 
diversify 

   --Promoting the aerospace industry as a new strategic subsector 

   --Encouraging technology acquisition, research, and development 

   --Upgrading infrastructure facilities 

   --Putting a priority on human resource development 

   Samsung To Produce Picture Tubes for Computer Monitors - Korea's 
Samsung Electron Devices (Malaysia) Sdn. Bhd. will invest $160 
million to establish two manufacturing lines to produce color 
picture tubes for computer monitors.  Production will start next 
year, in March and September, respectively.  (Kuala Lumpur NEW 
STRAITS TIMES 8 Feb 94 p 12) Bangkok Bureau 

   PHILIPPINES:  Hong Kong Company To Build Power Station - Gordon 
Y.S. Yu, managing director of Hong Kong-based Hopewell Holdings 
Ltd., stated that the company plans to build a power station in 
Pangasinan under a build-operate-transfer arrangement.  The power 
station's annual  capacity will be 1,000 mw initially and will reach 
2,000 mw eventually.  The station is part of an integrated 
development project that will include an international seaport 
terminal, an industrial park, a modern international airport, a 
superhighway (between Pangasinan, Metro Manila, and Quezon 
Province), and other support facilities.  Yu estimates that the 
entire project will cost approximately $5 billion.  (Manila BALITA 
14 Jan 94 p 2) 

   Sale of Oil Shares to Saudi Aramco Reported - The Philippine 
National Oil Company (PNOC) is selling 40 percent of its stake in 
Petron Corporation to Saudi Aramco for $502 million.  Petron will be 
guaranteed priority access to crude oil supplies.  (Quezon City 
MALAYA 4 Feb 94 p 11) Bangkok Bureau 

   Joint Venture Agreements Signed With Malaysian Firms - Nine joint 
venture agreements were signed during Malaysian Prime Minister 
Mahathir's recent visit to the Philippines.  Among them were a $200- 
million Cebu waterworks project, a 4O0-mw power plant worth $72 
million, and a $20-million water treatment project for Clark Air 
Base.  (Quezon City MALAYA 4 Feb 94 p 6) Bangkok Bureau 

   THAILAND:  Finance Ministry Sets 1995 Budget at $28.6 Billion - 
The Finance Ministry has budgeted $3.6 billion for fiscal year 1995, 
a 14.4-percent increase over the current fiscal year.  The 
government plans to spend at least 34.4 percent of the budget on 
public investment, the same as this fiscal year.  (Bangkok BANGKOK 
POST 12 Feb 94 p 24) Bangkok Bureau 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Foreign Firms Show Interest in Export Zone, 
New City - SUMMARY:  A company owned by Taiwan's ruling party is 
developing an export promotion zone and a "new city" project in Ho 
Chi Minh City jointly with the city's government, according to 
Japanese and Vietnamese press reports. Several dozen Taiwanese 
companies have signed leases to build in the zone, and the zone's 
management is currently negotiating with Hong Kong, Singapore, South 
Korean, and Japanese firms.  Japanese real estate and construction 
companies are said to be very interested in participating in 
developing the zone and new city. 

   The Tan Thuan Export Processing Zone (EPZ), the first of three 
such zones to be built in Vietnam, is being jointly developed by Ho 
Chi Minh City and the Taiwanese firm Central Trading and Development 
Corp. (CT and D), according to the 24 January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI).  The EPZ, 300 hectares (740 acres) in size and located in 
the Tan Thuan area of Nha Be District, Ho Chi Minh City, is being 
developed at a total cost of $90 million.  However, some of the 
infrastructure, such as a thermal power plant, will also be built to 
serve the adjacent "new town," which will be located on a 750- 
hectare (1,850-acre) tract.  (The 23 July 1993 NIKKEI states that 
the EPZ's size is 450 hectares (1,110 acres), and that the total 
area of the EPZ and new town is 2,600 hectares, or 6,420 acres). 
The combined EPZ-new town project is "one of the two largest 
development projects" currently under way in Vietnam, the 8 November 
1993 NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN notes, along with the $1.2-billion oil 
refinery being built by Taiwan's state-owned China Petroleum Co. and 
France's Total. 

   According to the Hanoi bimonthly VIETNAMESE TRADE UNIONS (VTU), 
issues 5-6 for 1992, the EPZ is located on the south bank of the 
Saigon River 4 km downriver from the city center.  Its location is 
"ideal" because it permits convenient transportation by sea, land, 
or air--it is located only 10 km from Tan Son Nhat international 
airport--and the EPZ is close to Vietnam's North-South highway, 
connects with Route 15, a major artery, into Ho Chi Minh City, and 
has convenient access to other major roads in southern Vietnam.  The 
VTU article reports that infrastructural construction work began in 
September 1991, and overall construction of the zone is expected to 
take six years.  Total construction costs for the zone will come to 
$89.9 million, the 24 January NIKKEI article reports.  The VTU 
article also states that $55 million will be invested in a highway, 
which it does not identify.  The 24 January NIKKEI reports that CT 
and D's "total investment in Vietnamese development projects" is 
$600 million.  Also participating in development of the EPZ is the 
Taiwanese firm Pan-Viet Co., according to the VTU article. 
   The 28 September 1993 Hanoi NHAN DAN reports that CT and D and 
the Tan Thuan Industrial Development Co. established a 50-year joint 
venture company to build an 18-km highway from Nha Be District to 
Binh Chanh District in Ho Chi Minh City, and the infrastucture for 
the area along this highway.  CT and D will contribute 70 percent of 
the joint venture's $60 million in upfront capital, the paper 
reports, and total investment in the project will come to $242 
million. 

   According to the 13-19 January Hanoi THOI BAO KINH VIET NAM, the 
Japanese corporations Mitsui, Nomura, and Mitsubishi have set up 
investment projects at the Tan Thuan EPZ.  Juki, another Japanese 
corporation, plans to build a factory to produce sewing machine 
parts, with a preliminary investment capital of $16 million.  Juki 
is renting 13,000 square meters at the EPZ.  To date, some 26 
companies have invested $310 million in Tan Thuan. 

   Taiwan's KMT Owns 75 Percent of Development Company - The 24 
January NIKKEI article reports that CT and D was established in 1988 
by Taiwan's ruling party, the Kuomintang (KMT), to support the 
development of civilian projects in Southeast Asia and China.  The 
KMT owns 75 percent of the company's shares, while company officers, 
including President Ting Shan-li, own the remaining 25 percent. 
With KMT backing, NIKKEI asserts, CT and D has "strong political and 
financial clout."  Through monthly visits to Vietnam, President Ting 
has developed a "large pipeline" to government officials, NIKKEI 
adds, and last August he was made an "honorary citizen" of Ho Chi 
Minh City. 

   CT and D plans to lease tracts in the EPZ to Taiwanese, Hong 
Kong, South Korean, Singapore, Japanese, and other foreign firms, 
according to the 24 (5 uary NIKKEI article.  Already 31 companies, 
nearly all Taiwanese, have decided to set up operations in the zone, 
particularly spinning, textile, and apparel companies.  In addition, 
as of the end of December 1993, CT and D planned to attract 100 new 
foreign companies.  One Taiwanese textile company has already begun 
operations in the EPZ and four other firms currently are building 
plants. 

   In addition, NIKKEI reports, observer groups from major U.S. 
corporations, "including IBM and General Electric," have visited the 
zone and have given "very positive responses" concerning future 
participation. 

   Investing Companies To Receive Favorable Terms - To create a 
favorable climate for foreign investors, the VTU article states, 
companies locating in the EPZ will be exempt from import duties on 
equipment, materials, and some specific goods, and from export taxes 
on goods shipped abroad.  Production factories will be exempt from 
the income tax (10 percent of profits) during the first four years, 
while service companies will be exempt from taxes (15 percent of 
profits) in the two years from the year they begin to make profits. 
If an investor reinvests profits in production or invests elsewhere 
in Vietnam, "revenue taxes he had paid on the profits in 
reinvestment" will be returned.  Companies remitting profits abroad 
will pay a 5-percent profit tax. 

   The VTU article states that priority will be given to companies 
in a wide range of light industrial firms--including those producing 
food and drinks, household utensils, textiles, leather goods, paper, 
plastic goods, and packaging materials; electronics and mechanical 
engineering firms; and service industry companies that are engaged 
in "banking, insurance, construction and auditing."  A separate 
thermal power plant complex with a capacity of 675 megawatts (mw) 
(see below) and a "safe water" plant will be built for the zone, the 
article notes, and in collaboration with the Ho Chi Minh City Post 
Office, a telecommunications network will be established.  The EPZ 
will also have a "specialized organization" to quickly solve 
investor claims.  The EPZ's managing board is authorized to "grant 
investment licences within three months" and issue trading licences, 
import-export licences, and construction permits and will settle 
"labor and economic contract disputes."  The EPZ will develop into 
"a big center for production, export and import of the whole 
country" and will provide "hundreds of thousands of jobs" for Ho Chi 
Minh City residents, the article concludes. 

   'New City' To Be Built Adjacent to EPZ - According to the 24 
January NIKKEI, the EPZ project includes development of an adjacent 
new city," comprising 750 hectares (1,852 acres).  The 21 January 
NIKKEI adds that in addition to serving as a "bedroom community" for 
foreigners working in the EPZ, the new city will have office 
buildings, hotels, government offices, a stock exchange, residential 
housing, and schools.  The 17 November NIKKEI SANGYO reports that 
investment in the new city--presumably for its basic development and 
infrastructure--will be $240 million. 

   CT and D, Hong Kong Company To Build Thermal Generating Plant - 
CT and D and the New World Development Group, a major Hong Kong 
property developer, have established a joint venture company to 
build a thermal power plant to supply electricity to the EPZ and the 
new city, according to the 17 November NIKKEI SANGYO.  This will be 
"the first power-generating project in Vietnam financed with foreign 
capital."  The plant, to be managed by a new company, Hip Fok Power 
Co., will cost $205 million and will be built in two stages on a 
27.5-hectare (68-acre) site.  First, a 425-mw plant will be 
completed by mid-1977, and "later" a 250-mw generating facility will 
be added. 

   As a short-term measure to provide electricity, by the end of 
1993 CT and D planned to install 6 mw of generating capacity, which 
will be expanded to 50 mw by the end of this year.  The Vietnamese 
Government has approved the project and "site development has 
begun." 

   Japanese Firms Eager To Participate in Development Work - The 21 
January NIKKEI reports that henceforth CT and D intends to expand 
participation in the EPZ to other foreign investors to speed up 
development of the zone.  A number of Japanese firms are eager to 
participate, particularly exporting companies and real estate and 
construction firms.  In February, a meeting of Japanese companies 
interested in participating in the EPZ's development will be held. 
Raizu, a Tokyo-based planning and design company, has been selected 
to serve as the focal point for gathering information concerning 
consulting work for the EPZ and information for Japanese firms 
planning to invest in the new town. 

   FEATURE:  Changes in State Enterprises Reported - SUMMARY: 
Recent press articles report that Vietnamese state enterprises are 
currently undergoing "major" changes, either merging to become 
"state economic groups" or being privatized.  Under the auspices of 
the prime minister or the Ministry of Finance, "managing councils" 
will be appointed to run the newly formed enterprises.  The 
government has announced that it will be "very strict" in dealing 
with money-losing enterprises and will not subsidize them "in any 
way." 

   According to the 23-29 December 1;993 Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE VIET 
NAM, there are nearly 6,000 state enterprises in Vietnam and most of 
them are "small, outdated, and backward."  THOI BAO notes that these 
enterprises are currently going through "major" changes, either 
merging to become "state economic groups" or being privatized. 

   The 2 January Ho Chi Minh City THANH NIEN quotes Tran Du Lich, a 
member of the National Assembly and the government's Advisory Board, 
as saying that state enterprises will eventually be "capitalized" 
and become "independent legal entities."  According to Minister Le 
Xuan Trinh of the prime minister's office, a department under the 
prime minister or the Ministry of Finance will be created to oversee 
"managing councils" that will control the newly formed enterprises. 
During the current "transition period," municipal or provincial 
People's Committee chairmen may be given the responsibility of 
appointing the managing councils. 

   In its November 1993 issue, the Party journal TAP CHI CONG SAN 
states that over 30 percent of state enterprises are suffering 
losses and over 20 percent are nearly bankrupt.  The 12 December 
1993 THUONG MAI reports that 20 percent of the 6,000 state 
enterprises nationwide "never earn a profit."  Some 15 percent are 
operating in the red while others are on the verge of bankruptcy, 
the paper says.  Some 20 percent of the enterprises under the 
Ministry of Marine Products, 26 percent of those under the Ministry 
of Agriculture and Food Industry, and 12 percent of those under the 
Ministry of Trade are operating at a loss.  Of the money-losing 
enterprises, 25 percent are in Quang Nam-Da Nang, 23 percent in 
Haiphong, 7.5 percent in Ho Chi Minh City, and 7 percent in Hanoi. 

   The 12 December 1993 Ho Chi Minh City TUOI TRE CHU NHAT mentions 
a report made by Minister of Finance Ho Te at a recent National 
Assembly meeting, stating that the government will be "very strict" 
and "will not  subsidize money-losing firms in any way." 

   Stock Exchange Opening Delayed by Slow Privatization Efforts - 
Plans by the Vietnamese Government to open the country's first stock 
exchange in Ho Chi Minh City may be delayed because of its tardiness 
in privatizing state-owned companies and enacting the required 
legislation.  The government is planning to open the exchange in 
mid-1994 "at the earliest."  Foreign investors are eager to buy 
shares in Vietnamese companies, but activity will remain at a low 
level even if foreigners are allowed to invest, because of the poor 
financial condition of many state-run companies. 

   Of the 17 firms that have been publicly named to be privatized 
and issue stock, only four have actually taken steps in this 
direction.  To date the only firm that has issued stock is the Union 
of Transport Agents.  Two other companies, Legamex and Hiep Phu An 
Shoe Co., cannot find purchasers for their shares. 

   The number of state-owned companies has rapidly decreased the 
past few years.  In 1990, there were about 12,000 firms, but this 
total had fallen to around 7,000 by 1993.  However, of the 7,000, 
only 6,500 firms are actually operating, "most" are experiencing 
financial difficulties, and 400 firms are incurring "serious 
losses."  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 4 Feb 94 p 5) 

   State Bank Takes Steps To Increase Capital Mobilization - The 
Vietnam State Bank aims to mobilize capital by introducing and/or 
promoting the following: 

   --Individual bank accounts allowing private citizens to make 
deposits as well as other kinds of transactions 

   --Long-term government bonds to mobilize capital for capital 
construction 

   --Long-term securities, issued by commercial banks 

   --Additional long-term savings accounts to borrow against 

   --Stocks in businesses, made available for purchase 

   --Investment funds 

   --Increasing relations with international financial organizations 
to attract foreign capital. 

   According to the State Bank, in 1993 Vietnam's money supply rose 
by over 5 trillion dong (about $500 million) while the capital 
mobilized by commercial banks increased by 1.36 trillion dong (about 
$136 million).  Overall, commercial banks were only able to attract 
capital that allowed them to make short-term loans (for one year or 
less).  (Hanoi LAO DONG 28 Dec 93 p 1) 

   Thai Companies Undertaking Range of Investments - Several of 
Thailand's largest conglomerates are laying the groundwork for 
making large investments in Vietnam.  Several conglomerates, such as 
the Chareun Phokphan Group and the Siam Cement Group, which have 
already formulated their Vietnam investment plans, have accelerated 
them because of  the entry of American and European multinational 
companies into Vietnam.  The main focus of Thai investment is 
Vietnam's infrastructure. 

   The Chareun Phokphan Group has reached basic agreement with Ho 
Chi Minh City to install 100,000 communications circuits at a cost 
of $150 million.  Also, the Chinnawat Group is in the process of 
applying for permission from the Vietnamese Government to invest in 
the communications and broadcasting sectors. 

   The Siam Cement Group, Thailand's largest manufacturing 
conglomerate, is setting up a joint-venture cement sales company in 
the suburbs of Ho Chi Minh City.  In the future, Siam Cement is 
planning construction of a cement plant with an annual capacity of 
30,000 tons, and is also studying local production of ceramic 
products and tiles. 

   The Sahawiriya Group, a leading Thai office automation and 
information equipment company, is in the process of opening a 
"software development center" in Hanoi through the group's software 
subsidiary.  Its goal is to develop "international-use software," 
such as English-language products, for export to Europe and the 
United States.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 5 Feb 94 p 3) 

   Malaysian Company To Develop Da Nang Export Processing Zone - The 
firm Malaysia South-South Cooperation (MASSCORP) will develop the Da 
Nang Export Processing Zone (EPZ) in cooperation with the city's 
development corporation.  MASSCORP is a company organized through 
the good offices of Prime Minister Mahathir by Malaysian companies 
desiring to promote joint projects with developing countries. 
Agreement regarding the Da Nang EPZ was reached during Mahathir's 
visit to Vietnam in April 1992. 

   The 300-hectare (740-acre) EPZ, to be developed at a cost of $150 
million, will be used by "the many" Malaysian companies eager to set 
up operations in Vietnam to take advantage of low wages and exploit 
Da Nang's proximity to China and Hong Kong.  Japanese trading 
companies "are also interested" in the zone.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 14 Feb 94 p 3) 

   Singapore Firm To Build Housing Complex in Ho Chi Minh City - DSB 
Land, a large Singapore real estate development company, has 
received permission to build Ho Chi Minh City's first joint-venture 
luxury apartment complex for foreigners.  The State Committee for 
Cooperation and Investment (SCCI) has already approved the $7.2 
million project. 

   A DSB subsidiary, Mekong Holdings, will contribute 75 percent of 
the capital, while the Vietnamese firm, Mikiko Construction, will 
invest 25 percent.  Construction of the project's first phase will 
begin by yearend, and the entire project will be completed in two 
years, including the swimming pool, tennis courts, and other 
facilities.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 8 Feb 94 p 3) 

   Top Foreign Investor Countries Listed 

   As of 25 December 1993, 41 countries have invested in Vietnam. 

BOT 

Country                            Investment 
                                   (in million $) 

Taiwan                             1,529 
Hong Kong                          1,273 
France                             638 
Australia                          544 
ROK                                527 
Japan                              475 
Malaysia                           434 
Singapore                          381 
Great Britain                      308 
Holland                            283 


   The actual amount of capital invested in Vietnam is as follows: 

Year                               Investment 
                                   (in million $) 

1988-1989                          160 
1990                               200 
1991                               260 
1992                               463 
1993                               1,001 

   Foreign investment (in percent) went to the following sectors: 

Sector                   1991      1992      1993 

Industries               27        40        38 
Oil, Gas                 22        27        18 
Tourism, Services        26        21        26 
Agriculture, Forestry    15        4         8 
Others                   10        8         10 

EOT 

   (Hanoi TUAN BAO QUOC TE 6-12 Jan 94 p 7) 

   Foreign Investment in 1993 in Hanoi Reported - In 1993, 44 
projects were licensed in Hanoi, accounting for 39.2 percent of the 
investment projects in the last five years while investment capital 
amounted to $678 million, accounting for 59.6 percent the total for 
the last five years.  To date, 112 investment projects in Hanoi, 
capitalized at $1.137 billion have been licensed. 

   Foreign investment in Hanoi is mainly concentrated in industrial 
production (39 percent) and hotels and services (35 percent). 
Average investment capital increased from $6.75 million in 1989 to 
$15.4 million in 1993.  (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM 23-29 Dec 93 
p 13) 

   Thai Firms To Build Video Conference System, Industrial Park - 
The Loxley Public Company is scheduled to sign a $32-million 
contract with the Ho Chi Minh City Post and Telecommunications 
Service to develop Vietnam's video conference system.  The three- 
phase project will link Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City, and expand 
service to other Vietnamese cities as well as to overseas markets. 
The project is expected to become operational in mid-1994.  (Bangkok 
Voice of Free Asia 1030 GMT 3 Feb 94) 

   The Bang Pakong Industrial Park Company plans to build a $400- 
million industrial park in Vietnam.  Two Thai companies have already 
expressed interest in establishing a glass factory and a pickup 
truck assembly plant at the industrial park.  (Bangkok NAEO NA 10 
Feb 94 p 5) Bangkok Bureau 

   Japan, Taiwan To Provide Equipment for Cement Plant - The 
Haiphong Cement Corporation has signed a $90.2-million contract with 
three Japanese and Taiwanese companies to obtain 25,000 tons of 
equipment.  When the equipment is completely installed in 1997, the 
corporation will have an annual production capacity of 1.4 million 
tons of cement.  (Hanoi Television Network 1215 GMT 5 Feb 94) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Telecommunications Agreement Signed With Canada - The Asia 
regional managing director of Canada's Nordon Telecom Company has 
recently signed an agreement with the director general of the 
Vietnam Post and Telegraph General Corporation to supply Vietnam 
with a digital modulation system codenamed DMS-100.  Nordon Telecom, 
with financial support from Japan's Mitsui Co., will assemble the 
$6.1-million system in Haiphong City.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 0500 
GMT 11 Feb 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   Joint Venture With Japan To Produce Paper - The $2.968-million 
Viet Nhat (Vietnam-Japan) paper factory in Da Nang has been 
officially commissioned.  Its production capacity will be 50,000 
tons of paper for this year, and 100,000 tons annually thereafter. 
(Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 2300 GMT 2 Feb 94) Bangkok Bureau 
EAG/24FEBRUARY1994/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP/jf 24/2153Z FEB 

